Little somethin for my godson Elijah and a little girl named Corinne
Some say the blacker the berry, the sweeter the juice
I say the darker the flesh then the deeper the roots
I give a holler to my sisters on welfare
Tupac cares, and don't nobody else care
And uhh, I know they like to beat ya down a lot
When you come around the block brothas clown a lot
But please don't cry, dry your eyes, never let up
Forgive but don't forget, girl keep your head up
And when he tells you you ain't nuttin don't believe him
And if he can't learn to love you you should leave him
Cause sista you don't need him
And I ain't tryin to gas ya up, I just call em how I see em
You know it makes me unhappy 
When brothas make babies, and leave a young mother to be a pappy
And since we all came from a woman
Got our name from a woman and our game from a woman
I wonder why we take from our women
Why we rape our women, do we hate our women?
I think it's time to kill for our women
Time to heal our women, be real to our women
And if we don't we'll have a race of babies
That will hate the ladies, that make the babies
And since a man can't make one
He has no right to tell a woman when and where to create one
So will the real men get up
I know you're fed up ladies, but keep your head up
Keep ya head up, oooo child things are gonna get easier
ooooo child things are gonna get brighter 
Aiyyo, I remember Marvin Gaye, used to sing ta me
He had me feelin like black was tha thing to be
And suddenly tha ghetto didn't seem so tough
And though we had it rough, we always had enough
I huffed and puffed about my curfew and broke the rules
Ran with the local crew, and had a smoke or two
And I realize momma really paid the price
She nearly gave her life, to raise me right
And all I had ta give her was my pipe dream
Of how I'd rock the mic, and make it to tha bright screen
I'm tryin to make a dollar out of fifteen cents
It's hard to be legit and still pay tha rent
And in the end it seems I'm headin for tha pen
I try and find my friends, but they're blowin in the wind
Last night my buddy lost his whole family
It's gonna take the man in me to conquer this insanity
It seems tha rain'll never let up
I try to keep my head up, and still keep from gettin wet up
You know it's funny when it rains it pours
They got money for wars, but can't feed the poor
Say there ain't no hope for the youth and the truth is
it ain't no hope for tha future
And then they wonder why we crazy
I blame my mother, for turning my brother into a crack baby
We ain't meant to survive, cause it's a setup
And even though you're fed up
Huh, ya got to keep your head up
And uhh
To all the ladies havin babies on they own
I know it's kinda rough and you're feelin all alone
Daddy's long gone and he left you by ya lonesome
Thank the Lord for my kids, even if nobody else want em
Cause I think we can make it, in fact, I'm sure
And if you fall, stand tall and comeback for more
Cause ain't nuttin worse than when your son
wants to kno why his daddy don't love him no mo'
You can't complain you was dealt this
hell of a hand without a man, feelin helpless
Because there's too many things for you to deal with
Dying inside, but outside you're looking fearless
While tears, is rollin down your cheeks
Ya steady hopin things don't all down this week
Cause if it did, you couldn't take it, and don't blame me
I was given this world I didn't make it
And now my son's getten older and older and cold
From havin the world on his shoulders
While the rich kids is drivin Benz
I'm still tryin to hold on to my survivin friends
And it's crazy, it seems it'll never let up, but
please... you got to keep your head upOne, two, three and to the fo'
Snoop Doggy Dogg and Dr. Dre are at the do'
Ready to make an entrance, so back on up
Gimme the microphone first, so I can bust like a bubble
Compton and Long Beach together, now you know you in trouble
Ain't nothin' but a G thang, baaaaabay!
Two loc'ed out G's so we're craaaaazay!
Death Row is the label that paaaaays me!
Unfadable, so please don't try to fade this 
But, uh, back to the lecture at hand
Perfection is perfected, so I'm 'a let 'em understand
From a young G's perspective
And before me dig out a bitch I have ta' find a contraceptive
You never know she could be earnin' her man,
And learnin' her man, and at the same time burnin' her man
Now you know I ain't wit that shit, Lieutenant
Ain't no pussy good enough to get burnt while I'm up in it
 Now that's realer than real-deal Holyfield
And now all you hookas and ho's know how I feel 
Well if it's good enough to get broke off a proper chunk
I'll take a small piece of some of that funky stuff 
It's like this and like that and like this and uh
It's like that and like this and like that and uh
It's like this and like that and like this and uh
Dre, creep to the mic like a phantom 
Well I'm peepin', and I'm creepin', and I'm creep-in'
But I damn near got caught, 'cause my beeper kept beepin'
Now it's time for me to make my impression felt
So sit back, relax, and strap on your seatbelt
You never been on a ride like this befo'
With a producer who can rap and control the maestro
At the same time with the dope rhyme that I kick
You know, and I know, I flow some ol funky shit
To add to my collection, the selection
Symbolizes dope, take a toke, but don't choke
If ya' do, ya' have no clue
O' what me and my homey Snoop Dogg came to do 
It's like this and like that and like this and uh
It's like that and like this and like that and uh
It's like this, and we ain't got no love for those
So jus' chill, 'til the next episode 
Fallin' back on that ass with a hellified gangsta' lean
Gettin' funky on the mic like a' old batch o' collard greens
It's the capital S, oh yes, the fresh N-double O-P
D-O-double G-Y D-O-double G ya' see
Showin' much flex when it's time to wreck a mic
pimpin' ho's and clockin' a grip like my name was Dolomite
Yeah, and it don't quit
I think they in a mood for some mothafuckin' G shit
So Dre. 
We gotta give 'em what dey want 
We gotta break 'em off somethin' 
And it's gotta be bumpin'  
It's where it takes place so I'm a ask your attention
Mobbin like a mothafucka but I ain't lynchin
Droppin' the funky shit that's makin the sucka niggaz mumble
When I'm on the mic, it's like a cookie, they all crumble
Try to get close, and your ass'll get smacked
My mothafuckin homie Doggy Dogg has my back
Never let me slip, 'cause if I slip, then I'm slippin'
But if I got my Nina, then you know I'm straight trippin'
And I'm a continue to put the rap down, put the mack down
And if your bitches talk shit, I have ta' put the smack down
Yeah, and ya' don't stop
I told you I'm just like a clock when I tick and I tock
But I'm never off, always on, 'til the break dawn
C-O-M-P-T-O-N, and the city they call Long Beach
Puttin' the shit together
Like my nigga D.O.C., no one can do it better 
Like this, that and this and uh
It's like that and like this and like that and uh
It's like this, and we ain't got no love for those
So jus' chill, 'til the next episodeSee the lust in your eye
I know you cant hide it
And your walk and your vibe
Make me wanna try it
Like a 'lac spinning rims
I love it when you ride it
You a stallion baby
You know you got body
You workin' that thang
You twurkin' that thang
I love them g-strings
It's just a G'-thang
I'm murkin' that thang
I'm twurkin' that thang
Still strokin' that thang
It's just a G'-thang
Can you make it juicy for me?
Or I can make it juicy for you
You get sweaty for me
And I can get sweaty for you
Now,I'm a passionate lover
That like passionate sex
Butt-naked in the classroom
On the teacher's school desk
Triple X rated
Call me Slick-Em hound 
I get that body wet
And then I lick 'em down 
I'm on point
And best believe I ain't no teaser 
I wanna get deep and a little bit of deep and a little bit of deeper 
Sweeping you off your feet
Like a rake
Talking 'bout Slick-Em wait 
Now I ain't stopping
Till I feel the backboard break
I'll be yo lover man
Yo special lover man
And I'll do anything
That u want me to do
Plus more and more
Now if you want me to rub u down
Massage your body
Cuz you feeling sore
Then baby just close the door
And let me take control
I'll be the man of your dreams
Better yet your superman
Take you places you never been
So close you can call us kin
Cuz you got that juicy
And I love your body next to me
I sweat for you
So sweat for me
You so juicy you know where
And I wanna put my you know what
Down there
I got a fetish for pulling hair
So I might end up with a track or 2
Crushed in my fingertips
Wanna caress your hips
Rub my lips against your lips
Oo Baby come closer to me
Express your emotions to me
Wanna press my body against yours
Feel the sweat coming from our pores
I'm pushing harder inside ya
Forget mine girl get yours
You so juicy for me
And I'm so juicy for you
Ain't no better feeling
Than me inside you
I'm tasting every drop
Like at the candy shop
I'll lick your lollipop
I'll put that thing on lock
I'll let you climb on top
And let that nookie pop
I'm in the cookie jar
I ain't no rookie girl"Presidents to represent me" - 
"Get money!"
"I'm out for presidents to represent me" "Get money!"
"I'm out for presidents to represent me" "Get money!"
"I'm out for dead *fuckin* presidents to represent me "
Rock... on, Roc-A-Fella y'all
The saga continues
Ahh, who wanna bet us that we don't touch leathers
Stack cheddars forever, live treacherous all the et ceteras
To the death of us, me and my confidants, we shine
You feel the ambiance, y'all niggaz just rhyme
By the ounce dough accumulates like snow
We don't just shine, we illuminate the whole show; you feel me?
Factions from the other side would love to kill me
Spill three quarts of my blood into the street, let alone the heat
Fuck em, we hate a nigga lovin this life
In all possible ways, know the Feds is buggin my life
Hospital days, reflectin when my man laid up
On the Uptown high block he got his side sprayed up
I saw his life slippin, this is a minor set back
Yo, still in all we livin, just dream about the get back
That made him smile though his eyes said, "Pray for me"
I'll do you one better and slay these niggaz faithfully
Murder is a tough thing to digest, it's a slow process
and I ain't got nothin but time
I had near brushes, not to mention three shots
close range, never touched me, divine intervention
Can't stop I, from drinkin Mai-Tai's, with Ta Ta
Down in Nevada, ha ha, Poppa, word life
I dabbled in crazy weight without rap, I was crazy straight
Potnah, I'm still spendin money from eighty-eight... what?
Geyeah, know what? I'll make..
you and your wack mans fold like bad hands
Roll like Monopoly, ad-vance you copy me
like white crystals, I gross the most
at the end of the fiscal year than these niggaz can wish to
The dead presidential, canidate
with the sprinkles and the presidental, ice that'll offend you
In due time when crime fleas my mind
All sneak thieves and playa haters can shine
But until then I keep the trillion cut diamonds shinin brilliant
I'll tell you half the story, the rest you fill it in
Long as the villian win
I spend Japan yen, attend major events
Catch me in the joints, convinced my iguanas is bitin
J-A-Y hyphen, controllin, manipulatin
I got a good life man, pounds and pence
Nuff dollars make sense, while you ride the bench
Catch me swinging for the fence
Dead Presidents, ya know
Uh-huh, yeah, uh-huh, so be it
The Soviet, The Unified Steady Flow
You already know, you light I'm heavy roll, heavy dough
Mic macheted your flow, your paper falls slow
like confetti, mines a steady grow, bet he glow
Pay five dead it from blow, better believe I have
eleven sixty to show, my doe flip like Tae-Kwon
Jay-Z The Icon, baby, you like Dom, maybe this Cristal's
to change your life huh, roll with the winners
Heavy spenders like hit records: Roc-A-Fella
Don't get it corrected this shit is perfected 
from chips to chicks just drivin a Lexus
Make it without your gun, we takin everything you brung
We cake and you niggaz is fake and we gettin it done
Crime Family, well connected Jay-Z
And you fake thugs is Unplugged like MTV
I empty three, take your treasure, my pleasure
Dead presidentials, politics as usual
Bla-ouw!
"Dead  presidents to represent me "
"Dead  presidents to represent me "
"Dead  presidents to represent me "
"Dead  presidents to represent me "I sit alone in my four-cornered room
staring at candles
Oh that shit is on? Heh
Let me drop some shit like this here
Real smooth
At night I can't sleep, I toss and turn
Candle sticks in the dark, visions of bodies being burned
Four walls just staring at a nigga
I'm paranoid, sleeping with my finger on the trigger
My mother's always stressing I ain't living right
But I ain't going out without a fight
See, everytime my eyes close
I start sweatin, and blood starts comin out my nose
It's somebody watchin' the Ak' 
But I don't know who it is, so I'm watchin my back
I can see him when I'm deep in the covers
When I awake I don't see the motherfucker
He owns a black hat like I own
A black suit and a cane like my own
Some might say "take a chill, B"
But fuck that shit, there's a nigga trying to kill me
I'm poppin' in a clip when the wind blows
Every twenty seconds got me peeping out my window
Investigating the joint for traps
Checking my telephone for taps
I'm staring at the woman on the corner
It's fucked up when your mind is playing tricks on you
I make big money, I drive big cars
Everybody know me, it's like I'm a movie star
But late at night, somethin ain't right
I feel I'm being tailed by the same sucker's head lights
Is it that fool that I ran off the block
Or is it that nigga last week that I shot
Or is it the one I beat for five thousand dollars
Thought he had 'caine but it was Gold Medal Flour
Reach under my seat, grabbed my popper for the suckers
Ain't no use to be lying, I was scareder than a motherfucker
But they're laughing at pow pies and buried that quick
If it's going down let's get this shit over with
Here they come, just like I figured
I got my hand on the motherfucking trigger
What I saw'll make your ass start giggling
Three black, crippled and crazy senior citizens
I live by the sword
I take my boys everywhere I go
Because I'm paranoid
I keep looking over my shoulder and peeping around corners 
My mind is playing tricks on me
Day by day it's more impossible to cope
I feel like I'm the one that's doing dope
Can't keep a steady hand because I'm nervous
Every Sunday morning I'm in service
Playing for forgiveness
And trying to find an exit out of the business
I know the Lord is looking at me
But yet and still it's hard for me to feel happy
I often drift while I drive
Havin fatal thoughts of suicide
BANG and get it over with
And then I'm worry-free, but that's bullshit
I got a little boy to look after
And if I died then my child would be a bastard
I had a woman down with me
But to me it seemed like she was down to get me
She helped me out in this shit
But to me she was just another bitch
Now she's back with her mother
Now I'm realizing that I love her
Now I'm feeling lonely
My mind is playing tricks on me
This year Halloween fell on a weekend
Me and Geto Boyz are trick-or-treating
Robbing little kids for bags
Till an old man got behind our ass
So we speeded up the pace
Took a look back and he was right before our face
We'd be in for a squable no doubt
So I swung and hit the nigga in his mouth
He was going down, we figured
But this was no ordinary nigga
He stood about six or seven feet
Now, that's the nigga I'd been seeing in my sleep
So we triple-teamed on him
Dropping them motherfuckin B's on him
The more I swung the more blood flew
Then he disappeared and my boys disappeared, too
Then I felt just like a fiend
It wasn't even close to Halloween
It was dark as fuck on the streets
My hands were all bloody from punching on the concrete
God damn, homie
My mind is playing tricks on meI said a hip hop,
Hippie to the hippie,
The hip, hip a hop, and you don't stop, a rock it
To the bang bang boogie, say, up jump the boogie,
To the rhythm of the boogie, the beat.
Now, what you hear is not a test - I'm rappin' to the beat,
And me, the groove, and my friends are gonna try to move your feet.
See, I am Wonder Mike, and I'd like to say hello,
To the black, to the white, the red and the brown,
The purple and yellow.  But first, I gotta
Bang bang, the boogie to the boogie,
Say up jump the boogie to the bang bang boogie,
Let's rock, you don't stop,
Rock the rhythm that'll make your body rock.
Well so far you've heard my voice but I brought two friends along,
And the next on the mic is my man Hank,
C'mon, Hank, sing that song!
Check it out, I'm the C-A-S-A, the N-O-V-A,
And the rest is F-L-Y,
You see I go by the code of the doctor of the mix,
And these reasons I'll tell you why.
You see, I'm six foot one, and I'm tons of fun
When I dress to a T,
You see, I got more clothes than Muhammad Ali
and I dress so viciously.
I got bodyguards, I got two big cars
That definitely ain't the wack,
I got a Lincoln Continental and a sunfoofed Cadillac.
So after school I take a dip in the pool,
Which is really on the wall,
I got a colour TV, so I can see
The Knicks play basketball.  Hear me talk about
Checkbooks, credit cards, mo' money
Than a sucker could ever spend,
But I wouldn't give a sucker or a bum form the Rucker
Not a dime 'til I made it again.  Everybody go
Ho-tel, Mo-tel, Whatcha gonna do today? 
'Cos I'm a get a fly girl,
Gonna get some spank n' drive off in a def OJ.  Everybody go
Ho-tel, Mo-tel, Holiday Inn,
Say if your girl starts actin' up, then you take her friend.
Master Gee!  My mellow!
It's on to you, so whatcha gonna do?
Well, it's on'n'n'on'n'on on'n'on,
The beat don't stop until the break of dawn.
I said M-A-S, T-E-R, a G with a double E,
I said I go by the unforgettable name
Of the man they call the Master Gee.
Well, my name is known all over the world
By all the foxy ladies and the pretty girls.
I'm goin' down in history
As the baddest rapper there ever could be.
Now I'm feelin' the highs and you're feelin' the lows,
The beat starts gettin' into your toes
You start poppin' your fingers and stompin' your feet
And movin' your body while while you're sitting in your seat
And then damn!  Ya start doin' the freak, I said
Damn!  Right outta your seat
Then you throw your hands high in the air,
Ya rockin' to the rhythm, shake your derriere
Ya rockin' to the beat without a care,
With the sureshot MCs for the affair.
Now, I'm not as tall as the rest of the gang
But I rap to the beat just the same.
I got a little face, and a pair of brown eyes
All I'm here to do, ladies, is hypnotize
Singin' on'n'n'on'n'on on'n'on,
The beat don't stop until the break of dawn
Singin' on'n'n'on'n'on on'n'on,
Like a hot buttered pop da pop da pop dibbie dibbie
Pop da pop pop, don't you dare stop
Come alive y'all, gimme whatcha got
I guess by now you can take a hunch
And find that I am the baby of the bunch
But that's okay, I still keep in stride,
'Cos all I'm here to do is just wiggle your behind
Singin' on'n'n'on'n'on on'n'on,
The beat don't stop until the break of dawn.
Singin' on'n'n'on'n'on on'n'on,
Rock rock, y'all, throw it on the floor
I'm gonna freak you here, I'm gona freak you there,
I'm gonna move you outta this atmosphere.
'Cos I'm one of a kind and I'll shock your mind
I'll put TNT in your behind.  I said
One, two, three, four, come on, girls, get on the floor
A-come alive, y'all, a-gimme whatcha got
'Cos I'm guaranteed to make you rock
I said one, two, three, four, tell me, Wonder Mike
What are you waiting for?
I said a hip hop,
The hippie to the hippie
The hip hip a hop, and you don't stop, a rock it
To the bang bang boogie, say up jump the boogie,
To the rhythm of the boogie, the beat.
A Skiddleebebop, we rock, scooby doo,
And guess what, America, we love you
'Cos you rocked and a rolled with so much soul,
You could rock 'til a hundred and one years old.
I don't mean to brag, I don't mean to boast,
But we like hot butter on our breakfast toast
Rock it up, Baby Bubba!
Baby Bubba to the boogie da bang bang da boogie
To the beat, beat, it's unique
Come on everybody and dance to the beat!
A hip hop
The hippie to the hippie the
Hip hip a hop and you don't stop, rock it
Rock it out, Baby Bubba to the boogie da bang bang
The boogie to the boogie, the beat.
I said, I can't wait 'til the end of the week
When I'm rappin' to the rhythm of a groovy beat
And I attempt to raise your body heat.
Just blow your mind, so you can't speak
And do a thing but a-rock and shuffle your feet
And let it change up to a dance called the freak
And when you finally do come into your rhythmic beat,
Reast a little while so you don't get weak.
I know a man named Hank
He has more rhymes than a serious bank
So come on Hank, sing that song,
To the rhythm of the boogie, the bang bang da bong!
Well, I'm Imp the Dimp, the ladies' pimp,
The women fight for my delight.
But I'm the grandmaster with the three MCs
That shock the house for the young ladies
And when you come inside, into the front,
You do the freak, spank, and do the bump
And when the sucker MC try to prove a point,
We're a treacherous trio, we're the serious joint!
a-From sun to sun and from time to time
I sit down and write a brand new rhyme
Because they say that miracles never cease
I've created a devastating masterpiece
I'm gonna rock the mic 'til you can't resist,
Everybody, I say it goes like this
Well, I was walking home late one afternoon
A reporter stopped me for an interview
She said she's heard stories and she's heard fables
That I'm vicious on the mic and the turntable
This young reporter I did adore,
So I rocked some vicious rhymes like I never did before
She said, "Damn, fly guy, I'm in love with you
The Casanova legend must have been true"
I said, "By the way, baby, what's your name?"
Said, "I go by name of Lois Lane
And you could be my boyfriend, you surely can,
Just let me quit my boyfriend called Superman."
I said, "He's a fairy, I do suppose
Flyin' through the air in pantyhose
He may be very sexy, or even cute,
But he looks like a sucker in a blue and red suit,"
I said, "You need a man man who's got finesse
And his whole name across his chest
He may be able to fly all through the night,
But can he rock a party 'til the early light?
He can't satisfy you with his little worm,
But I can bust you out with my super sperm!"
I go do it, I go do it, I go do it, do it, do it.
An' I'm here an' I'm there, I'm Big Ban Hank, I'm everywhere
Just throw your hands up in the air
And party hardy like you just don't care
Let's do it, don't stop, y'all, a tick tock, y'all, you don't stop!
Go ho-tel, mo-tel, whatcha gonna do today? 
I'm gonna get a fly girl, gonna get some spank, drive off in a def OJ,
Everybody go, "Ho-tel, mo-tel, Holiday Inn"
You say if your girl starts actin' up, then you take her friend
I say skip, dive, what can I say?
I can't fit 'em all inside my OJ,
So I just tak half, and bust 'em out,
I give the rest to Master Gee so he can shock the house
It was twelve o'clock one Friday night
I was rockin' to the beat and feelin' all right
Everybody was dancin' on the floor
Doin' all the things they never did before
And then this fly girl with a sexy lean
She came into the bar, she came into the scene
She travelled deeper inside the room
All the fellas checked out her white Sassoons
She came up to the table, looked into my eyes
Then she turned around and shook her behind
So I said to myself, it's time for me to release
My vicious rhyme I call my masterpiece
And now people in the house, this is just for you
A little rap to make you boogaloo
Now the group you hear is called Phase Two
And let me tell you somethin', we're a helluva crew
Once a week, we're on the street
Just to cut in the jams and look at your feet
For you to party, you gotta have the moves,
So we'll get right down and get you a groove 
For you to dance, you got to be hot
So we'll get right down and make you rock
Now the system's on and the girls are there
You definitely have a rockin' affair
But let me tell you somethin', there's still one fact
And to have a party, you got to have a rap
So when the party's over, you're makin' it home,
And tryin' to sleep before the break of dawn
And while you're sleepin', you start to dream,
And thinkin' how you danced on the disco scene
My name appears in your mind,
Yeah, a name you know that was right on time
It was Phase Two just doin' a do
Rockin' you down 'cos you knew we could
To the rhythm of the beat that makes you freak,
Come alive girls, get on your feet
To the rhythm of the beat to the beat the beat
To the double beat beat that makes you freak
To the rhythm of the beat that says you go on
On'n'on into the break of dawn
Now I got a man comin' on right now
He's garuanteed to throw down
He goes by the name of Wonder Mike
Come on, Wonder Mike, do what you like!
I say a can of beer that's sweeter than honey,
Like a millionaire that has no money
Like a rainy day that is not wet,
Like a gamblin' fiend that does not bet
Like Dracula without his fangs,
Like the boogie to the boogie without the boogie bang
Like collard greens that don't taste good,
Like a tree that's not made out of wood
Like goin' up and not comin' down,
Is just like the beat without the sound, no sound
To the beat beat, you do the freak
Everybody just rock and dance to the beat
Have you ever went over a friends house to eat
And the food just ain't no good?
The macaroni's soggy, the peas are mushed,
And the chicken tastes like wood
So you try to play it off like you think you can
By saying that you're full
And then your friend says, "Mama, he's just being polite
He ain't finished, uh-uh, that's bull!"
So your heart starts pumpin' and you think of a lie
And you say that you already ate
And your friend says "Man, there's plenty of food"
So you pile some more on your plate
While the stinky food's steamin', your mind starts to dreamin'
Of the moment that it's time to leave
And then you look at your plate and your chicken's slowly rottin'
Into something that looks like cheese
Oh so you say "That's it, I gotta leave this place
I don't care what these people think,
I'm just sittin' here makin' myself nauseous
With this ugly food that stinks"
So you bust out the door while it's still closed
Still sick from the food you ate
And then you run to the store for quick relief
From a bottle of Kaopectate
And then you call your friend two weeks later
To see how he has been
And he says, "I understand about the food,
Baby Bubba, but we're still friends"
With a hip hop the hippie to the hippie
The hip hip a hop, a you don't stop the rockin'
To the bang bang boogie
Say up jump the boogie to the rhythm of the boogie the beat
I say, "Hank, can ya rock?
Can ya rock to the rhythm that just don't stop?
Can ya hip me to the shoobie doo?"
I said, "Come on, make, make the people move!"
I go to the balls and then ring the bell
Because I am the man with the clientele
And if ya ask me why I rock so well,
A Big Bang, I got clientele
And from the time I was only six years old
I never forgot what I was told
It was the best advice I ever had
It came from my wise, dear old dad
He said, "Sit down, punk, I wanna talk to you
And don't say a word until I'm through
Now there's a time to laugh, a time to cry
A time to live and a time to die
A time to break and a time to chill
To act civilized or act real ill
But whatever you do in your lifetime
You never let an MC steal your rhyme"
So from six to six 'til this very day
I'll always remember what he had to say
So when the sucker MCs try to chump my style
I let them know that I'm versatile
I got style, finesse, and a little black book
That's filled with rhymes and I know you wanna look
But the thing that seperates you from me
And that is called originality
Because my rhymes are on from what you heard
I didn't even bite, not a go---word
And I say a little more, later on tonight
So the sucker MCs can bite all night
A tick a tock, y'all, a beat beat, y'all
A let's rock, y'all, you don't stop
Ya go, "Ho-tel, mo-tel, whatcha gonna do today?" 
Ya say, "I'm gonna get a fly girl, gonna get some spank and
Drive off in a def OJ"
Everybody go, "Ho-tel, mo-tel, Holiday Inn"
Ya say if your girl starts actin' up, then you take her friends
A like that, y'all, to the beat, y'all
Beat beat y'all, ya don't stop!
A Master Gee, my mellow
It's on to you so whatcha gonna do?
Well, like Johnny Carson on the Late Show
A like Frankie Crocker in stereo
Well like the Barkay's singin' "Holy Ghost"
The sounds to throw down, they're played the most
It's like my man Captain Sky
Whose name he earned with his super sperm
We rock and we don't stop
Get off, y'all, I'm here to give you whatcha got
To the beat that it makes you freak
And come alive, girl, get on your feet
A like a Perry Mason without a case
Like Farrah Fawcett without her face
Like the Barkays on the mic
Like gettin' down right for you tonight
Like movin' your body so you don't know how
Right to the rhythm and throw down
Like comin' alive to the Master Gee
The brother who rocks so viciously
I said the age of one, my life begun
At the age of two I was doin' the do
At the age of three, it was you and me
Rockin' to the sounds of the Master Gee
At the age of four, I was on the floor
Givin' all the freaks what they bargained for
At the age of five I didn't take no jive
With the Master Gee it's all the way live
At the age of six I was a-pickin' up sticks
Rappin' to the beat, my stick was fixed
At the age of seven, I was rockin' in heaven
Don'tcha know I went off
I gotta run on down to the beat you see
Gettin' right on down, makin' all the girls
Just take off their clothes to the beat the beat
To the double beat beat that makes you freak
At the age of eight, I was really great
'Cause every night, you see, I had a date
At the age of nine, I was right on time
'Cause every night I had a party rhyme
Going on'n'n'on'n' on on'n'on
The beat don't stop until the break of dawn
A sayin' on'n'n'on'n' on on'n'on
Like a hot buttered de pop pop de popcorn...(Cash Rules Everything Around Me
C.R.E.A.M. get...)
Yeah, check this ol fly shit out
Word up
 Take you on a natural joint
 Here we here we go
 Check this shit, yo!
I grew up on the crime side, the New York Times side
Staying alive was no jive
Had second hands, moms bounced on old man
So then we moved to Shaolin land
A young youth, yo rockin the gold tooth, 'Lo goose
Only way, I begin to G' off was drug loot
And let's start it like this son, rollin with this one
And that one, pullin out gats for fun
But it was just a dream for the teen, who was a fiend
Started smokin woolies at sixteen
And running up in gates, and doing hits for high stakes
Making my way on fire escapes
No question I would speed, for cracks and weed
The combination made my eyes bleed
No question I would flow off, and try to get the dough off
Sticking up white boys in ball courts
My life got no better, same damn 'Lo sweater
Times is rough and tough like leather
Figured out I went the wrong route
So I got with a sick tight clique and went all out
Catchin keys from across seas
Rollin in MPV's, every week we made forty G's
Yo brothas respect mine, or anger the tech nine
Ch-POW! Move from the gate now
Cash Rules Everything Around Me
C.R.E.A.M.
Get the money
Dollar, dollar bill y'all 
It's been 22 long hard years and still strugglin
Survival got me buggin, but I'm alive on arrival
I peep at the shape of the streets 
And stay awake to the ways of the world cause shit is deep
A man with a dream with plans to make C.R.E.A.M.
Which failed; I went to jail at the age of 15
A young buck sellin drugs and such who never had much
Trying to get a clutch at what I could not touch
The court played me short, now I face incarceration
Pacin', going up state's my destination
Handcuffed in back of a bus, 40 of us
Life as a shorty shouldn't be so rough
But as the world turns I learned life is Hell 
Living in the world, no different from a cell
Everyday I escape from Jakes givin chase, sellin base
Smokin bones in the staircase
Though I don't know why I chose to smoke sess
I guess that's the time when I'm not depressed
But I'm still depressed, and I ask what's it worth?
Ready to give up so I seek the Old Earth
Who explained working hard may help you maintain
to learn to overcome the heartaches and pain
We got stickup kids, corrupt cops, and crack rocks
and stray shots, all on the block that stays hot
Leave it up to me while I be living proof
To kick the truth to the young black youth
But shorty's running wild, smokin sess, drinkin beer
And ain't trying to hear what I'm kickin in his ear
Neglected for now, but yo, it gots to be accepted
That what? That life is hected
Cash Rules Everything Around Me
C.R.E.A.M.
get the money
Dolla dolla bill y'aauhhhaaaauhhhhahhhauhhhhll, YEAHWord up! Y'knowhutI'msayin?
I gotta globe in the world in the mail today
NahI'msayin? Heh, word up!
Uhh, kid told me "Yo, the world is yours kid, put it in ya pocket"
Nahmean?
Make a brother feel good, word up!
Brother feel energised
I wanna dedicate this one to the game that put me on the map
Y'nahI'msayin?
I know you love it, the game is so irresistable to touch
You should see me when fienin for microphones that I can clutch
Droppin bombs, combinin the club attracts
like the Ol' Sugarhill Gang, King Tim and Fatback
There's no question the suggestion was made
The foundation was laid when the Furious played
Grandmaster Flash slayed the competition that was wishin
they could serve the technician with the number one position
Uhh, the real deal, Fearless Four scored
Bambataa was hotter, Spoony was givin em nutta
An' I was all up in my headzone, melody and all
Cosign and The Movement sayin "Yes, yes y'all"
It's just the love affair that never ended
I recommended that I take microphones and blow em up, ain't that splendid
This one goes out to all the hip-hop do-or-diers
A song is dedicated to the music I admire
Whenever and ever
We want you, I need you 
Whenever and ever
We want you, do you feel the same way too? 
Kane's era was terror, he warmed it up
Parrish and Erick cat lyrics that'll make ya turn it up
And I was in the cut, chillin in my drop-top Benz
with friends, loungin with my mens, laughin 'bout all the ends
that I spends, making snaps, pumping Kool G Rap and Biz
Dapper Don, Dookie wrotes I'm about to show what time it is
At the rooftop, I was with Doug E.Fresh and Slick Rick
'La Di Da Di, Who likes to party?' was the fat shit
I mean I saw this hip-hop thing on every level
Chuck D, PE, yes the rhythm and the rebel
I can reminisce the black fist, Uzi, Terminators
Terror doom techniques that terrorise the lighter shade
It's all about the game that we play everyday
Eric B & Rakim flow to such a diff'rent way
I'm lovin hip-hop cos it help brothers escape
Let's celebrate our music people before it's too late
Survival Of The Fittest-Mobb Deep, and Lost Boyz
Lickin shots got the game hot
They even flipped on 2PAC
Snoop Doggy Dogg put the West Coast in gear
Dr Dre, NWA, Eazy E's in here
I wanna tell the world they just don't understand
My man Nas Escobar, Wu-Tang Clan
Keith Murray to the Redman, down south Da Brat
My people are you with me where you at?...ya peep that?
I'm on a mission to rejuvenate the funk
Bring the game back and give the do-or-diers what they want
When you hear Craig Mack, Notorious B.I.G.
Latifah, Heavy D, you should reminisce of me
Some say it's Naughty By Nature-'hip-hop in all its glory'
A fleet of battleships floatin in diff'rent categories
My love affair with hip-hop'll never fade away
Sincerely yours, LL Cool J
Yeah, ain't no doubt about it kid, knowI'msayin?
Hip-hop's the game, helped a lot of brothers escape
Take it to another level, knowI'msayin?
It's our music, we own this music, knowhutI'msayin?
Word life! I wanna give a couple of shoutouts here, knowhutI'msayin?
First of all, I wanna thank my man Baby Chris, y'nahmean?
Helped me put this Mr. Smith...Mr.Smith album together
make it hot, knowI'msayin?
Thank the Trackmasters-?Pope Tone?, Steve Stout
we definitely turning this joint out, y'nahmean
Word bond! Hip-hop for life, kid!
Yeah!Now in my younger days I used to sport a shag
When I went to school I carried lunch in a bag
With an apple for my teacher 'cause I knew I'd get a kiss
Always got mad when the class was dismissed
But when it was in session, I always had a question
I would raise my hand to make her stagger to my desk and
help me with my problem, it was never much
Just a trick, to smell her scent and try to sneak a touch
Oh, how I wish I could hold her hand and give her a hug
She was married to the man, he was a thug, 
His name was Lee, he drove a Z,
he'd pick her up from school promptly at three o'clock
I was on her jock, yes indeedy I wrote graffiti on the bus
First I'd write her name then carve a plus,
with my name last, on the looking glass,
I seen her yesterday but still I had to let her pass
She keeps on passin me by...
When I dream of fairytales I think of me and Shelly
See she's my type of hype and I can't stand when brothers tell me
That I should quit chasin' and look for something better
But the smile that she shows makes me a go-getter
I haven't gone as far as asking if I could get with her
I just play it by ear and hope she gets the picture
I'm shootin for her heart, got my finger on the trigger
She could be my broad, and I could be her 
But, all I can do is stare...
Back as kids we used to kiss when we played truth or dare
Now she's more sophisticated, highly edu-ma-cated
not at all over-rated, I think I need a prayer
to get in her boots and it looks rather dry
I guess a twinkle in her eye is just a twinkle in her eye
Although she's crazy steppin, I'll try to stop her stride
Cause I won't have no more of this passin me by
Time for me to voice my opinion of not even pretendin she didn't have me
Strung like a chicken, chase my tail like a doggie
She was kind of like a star, thinking I was like a fan
Dude, she looked good, down side: she had a man
He was a rooty-toot, a nincompoop
She told me soon your little birdie's gonna fly the coop
She was a flake like corn, and I was born not to understand
By lettin her pass I had proved to be a better man
She keeps on passin me by...
Now there she goes again, the dopest Ethiopian
And now the world around me be gets movin in slow motion 
when-ever she happens to walk by - why does the apple of my eye
overlook and disregard my feelings no matter how much I try?
Wait, no, i did not really pursue my little princess with persistance;
And I was so low-key that she was unaware of my existance
From a distance I desired, secretly admired her;
Wired her a letter to get her, and it went:
My dear, my dear, my dear, you do not know me but I know you very well
Now let me tell you about the feelings I have for you
When I try, or make some sort of attempt, I symp
Damn I wish I wasn't such a wimp!
'Cause then I would let you know that I love you so
And if I was your man then I would be true
The only lying I would do is in the bed with you
Then I signed sincerely the one who loves you dearly, PS love me tender
The letter came back three days later: Return to Sender
Damn!
She keeps on passin me by...Now here's a little story I've got to tell
About three bad brothers you know so well
It started way back in history
With Adrock, M.C.A., and me - Mike D.
Been had a little horsy named Paul Revere
Just me and my horsy and a quart of beer
Riding across the land, kicking up sand
Sheriff's posse on my tail cause I'm in demand
One lonely Beastie I be
All by myself without nobody
The sun is beating down on my baseball hat
The air is gettin' hot the beer is getting flat
Lookin' for a girl I ran into a guy
His name is M.C.A., I said, "Howdy" he said, "Hi"
He told a little story that sounded well rehearsed
Four days on the run and that he's dying of thirst
The brew was in my hand and he was on my tip
His voice was hoarse, his throat was dry he asked me for a sip
He said, "Can I get some?"
I said, "You can't get none!"
Had a chance to run
He pulled out his shotgun
He was quick on the draw I thought I'd be dead
He put the gun to my head and this is what he said,
"Now my name is M.C.A. I've got a license to kill
I think you know what time it is it's time to get ill
Now what do we have here an outlaw and his beer
I run this land, you understand I make myself clear."
We stepped into the wind he had a gun, I had a grin
You think this story's over but it's ready to begin
"Now I got the gun you got the brew
You got two choices of what you can do
It's not a tough decision as you can see
I can blow you away or you can ride with me" I said, I'll ride with you if you can get me to the border
The sheriff's after me for what I did to his daughter
I did it like this, I did it like that
I did it with a whiffleball bat
So I'm on the run the cop's got my gun
And right about now it's time to have some fun
The King Adrock that is my name
And I know the fly spot where they got the champagne."
We rode for six hours then we hit the spot
The beat was a bumping and the girlies was hot
This dude was staring like he knows who we are
We took the empty spot next to him at the bar
M.C.A. said, "Yo, you know this kid?"
I said, "I didn't." but I know he did
The kid said, "Get ready cause this ain't funny
My name's Mike D. and I'm about to get money."
Pulled out the jammy aimed it at the sky
He yelled, "Stick 'em up!" and let two fly
Hands went up and people hit the floor
He wasted two kids that ran for the door
"I'm Mike D. and I get respect
Your cash and your jewelry is what I expect"
M.C.A. was with it and he's my ace
So I grabbed the piano player and I punched him in the face
The piano player's out the music stopped
His boy had beef and he got dropped
Mike D. grabbed the money M.C.A. snatched the gold
I grabbed two girlies and a beer that's cold.Word up son, word
yeah, to all the killers and a hundred dollar billas
for real niggas who ain't got no feelings
check it out now
I got you stuck off the realness, we be the infamous
you heard of us
official Queensbridge murderers
the Mobb comes equipped with warfare, beware
of my crime family who got nuff shots to share
for all of those who wanna profile and pose
rock you in your face, stab your brain wit' your nosebone
you all alone in these streets, cousin
every man for theirself in this land we be gunnin'
and keep them shook crews runnin'
like they supposed to
they come around but they never come close to
I can see it inside your face
you're in the wrong place
cowards like you just get they're whole body laced up
with bullet holes and such
speak the wrong words man and you will get touched
you can put your whole army against my team and
I guarantee you it'll be your very last time breathin'
your simple words just don't move me
you're minor, we're major
you all up in the game and don't deserve to be a player
don't make me have to call your name out
your crew is featherweight
my gunshots'll make you levitate
I'm only nineteen but my mind is old
and when the things get for real my warm heart turns cold
another nigga deceased, another story gets told
it ain't nothin' really
hey, yo dun spark the Phillie
so I can get my mind off these yellowbacked niggas
why they still alive I don't know, go figure
meanwhile back in Queens the realness is foundation
if I die I couldn't choose a better location
when the slugs penetrate you feel a burning sensation
getting closer to God in a tight situation
now, take these words home and think it through
or the next rhyme I write might be about you
Son, they shook...
'cause ain't no such things as halfway crooks
scared to death, scared to look
they shook
'cause ain't no such things as halfway crooks
scared to death, scared to look
livin' the live that of diamonds and guns
there's numerous ways you can choose to earn funds...earn funds
some of 'em get shot, locked down and turn nuns
cowardly hearts end straight up shook ones...shook ones
he ain't a crook son, he's just a shook one...shook one
For every rhyme I write, its 25 to life
yo, it's a must the gats we trust safeguardin' my life
ain't no time for hesitation
that only leads to incarceration
you don't know me, there's no relation
Queensbridge niggas don't play
I don't got time for your petty thinking mind
son, I'm bigga than those claimin' that you pack heat
but you're scared to hold
and when the smoke clears you'll be left with one in your dome
13 years in the projects, my mentality is what, kid
you talk a good one but you don't want it
sometimes I wonder do I deserve to live
or am I going to burn in hell for all the things I did
no time to dwell on that 'cause my brain reacts
front if you want kid, lay on your back
I don't fake jacks kid, you know I bring it to you live
stay in a child's place, kid you out o' line
criminal minds thirsty for recognition
I'm sippin' E&J, got my mind flippin'
I'm buggin' think I'm how bizar to hold my hustlin'
get that loot kid, you know my function
cause long as I'm alive I'ma live illegal
and once I get on I'ma put on, on my people
react mix to lyrics like Macs I hit your dome up
when I roll up, don't be caught sleepin'
cause I'm creepin'
Son, they shook...
'cause ain't no such things as halfway crooks
scared to death and scared to look 
they shook...
'cause ain't no such things as halfway crooks
scared to death and scared to look
they shook...
'cause ain't no such things as halfway crooks
scared to death and scared to look
they shook...
'cause ain't no such things as halfway crooks, crooks..
livin' the live that of diamonds and guns
there's numerous ways you can choose to earn funds...earn funds
but some of 'em get shot, locked down and turn nuns
cowardly hearts end straight up shook ones...shook ones
he ain't a crook son, he's just a shook one...shook one
Yeah, yeah, yeah
To all the villains and a hundred dollar billas
To real brothers who ain't got no dealings
G-yeah, the whole Bridge, Queens get the money
41st side 
keepin' it real 
Queens get the money...Booka-booka-booka-booka-booka-booka
Ha hah
You know the deal
It's just me yo
Beats by Su-Primo for all of my peoples, negroes and latinos
and even the gringos
Yo, check it one for Charlie Hustle, two for Steady Rock
Three for the fourth comin live, future shock
It's five dimensions, six senses
Seven firmaments of heaven to hell, 8 Million Stories to tell
Nine planets faithfully keep in orbit
with the probable tenth, the universe expands length
The body of my text posess extra strength
Power-liftin powerless up, out of this, towerin inferno
My ink so hot it burn through the journal
I'm blacker than midnight on Broadway and Myrtle
Hip-Hop past all your tall social hurdles
like the nationwide projects, prison-industry complex
Broken glass wall better keep your alarm set
Streets too loud to ever hear freedom sing
Say evacuate your sleep, it's dangerous to dream
but you chain cats get they CHA-POW, who dead now
Killin fields need blood to graze the cash cow
It's a number game, but shit don't add up somehow
Like I got, sixteen to thirty-two bars to rock it
but only 15% of profits, ever see my pockets like
sixty-nine billion in the last twenty years
spent on national defense but folks still live in fear like
nearly half of America's largest cities is one-quarter black
That's why they gave Ricky Ross all the crack
Sixteen ounces to a pound, twenty more to a ki
A five minute sentence hearing and you no longer free
40% of Americans own a cell phone
so they can hear, everything that you say when you ain't home
I guess, Michael Jackson was right, "You Are Not Alone"
Rock your hardhat black cause you in the Terrordome
full of hard niggaz, large niggaz, dice tumblers
Young teens and prison greens facin life numbers
Crack mothers, crack babies and AIDS patients
Young bloods can't spell but they could rock you in PlayStation
This new math is whippin motherfuckers ass
You wanna know how to rhyme you better learn how to add
It's mathematics
"The Mighty Mos Def.."
"It's simple mathematics" -> 
"Check it out!"
"I revolve around science.."
"What are we talking about here?"
.. "Do your math" -> 
.. "One.. t-t-two.. three, four" -> 
.. "What are we talking about here?" ..
Yo, it's one universal law but two sides to every story
Three strikes and you be in for life, manditory
Four MC's murdered in the last four years
I ain't tryin to be the fifth one, the millenium is here
Yo it's 6 Million Ways to Die, from the seven deadly thrills
Eight-year olds gettin found with 9 mill's
It's 10 P.M., where your seeds at?  What's the deal
He on the hill puffin krill to keep they belly filled
Light in the ass with heavy steel, sights on the pretty shit in life
Young soldiers tryin to earn they next stripe
When the average minimum wage is $5.15
You best believe you gotta find a new ground to get cream
The white unemployment rate, is nearly more than triple for black
so frontliners got they gun in your back
Bubblin crack, jewel theft and robbery to combat poverty
and end up in the global jail economy
Stiffer stipulations attached to each sentence
Budget cutbacks but increased police presence
And even if you get out of prison still livin
join the other five million under state supervision
This is business, no faces just lines and statistics
from your phone, your zip code, to S-S-I digits
The system break man child and women into figures
Two columns for who is, and who ain't niggaz
Numbers is hardly real and they never have feelings
but you push too hard, even numbers got limits
Why did one straw break the camel's back?  Here's the secret:
the million other straws underneath it - it's all mathematics
 "Mathematics.."Hit it!
Aww yea!
Yea...
La di da di... la di da di,
La di, la di!
You know what, you peep this,
La di da di, we like to party.
We don't cause trouble, we dont bother nobody.
We're... just some men that's on the mic, 
And when we rock upon the mic, 
We rock the mic .
For all a y'all, keepin' y'all in health.
Just to see ya smile and enjoy ya'self.
Cause it's cool when you cause a cozy conditionin',
That we create, so that's our mission, so listen,
To what we say because this type of shit happens everyday.
I... woke up around ten o'clock in the mornin',
Gave myself a , a mornin' yawn and...
Went to the bathroom to wash up,
Had some soap on my face and my hand upon the cup,
I said a  on the wall...
Who is the top choice of them all?
There was a rumble dumble, 
Five minutes it lasted.... the mirror said,
.
Yo that's true, that's why we never have no beef,
So then I washed off the soap and brushed the gold teeth.
Used "Oil of Olay" cause my skin gets pale.
Then I got the files, for my fingernails.
True to the style on my behalf
I put the bubbles in the tub so I could have a bubble bath.
Clean, dry, was my body and hair,
I threw on my brand new Gucci underwear.
For all the girls I might take home, 
I got the Johnson's Baby Powder and the .
Fresh dressed like a millions bucks, threw on the Valley shoes 
And the fly green socks.
Stepped out the house, stopped short, oh no!
I went back in I forgot the...
Then I dilly  ran through a ,
Bumped into my old girl  from the .
This was a girl playing hard to get
So I said "What's wrong?" cause she looked upset
She said uh, 
Say what? 
She said what? 
And now, my life is filled with rainy days.
And I love you so, how much you'll never know.
Cause you took your love away from me.
Now what was I to do
She was crying over me and she was feeling blue
I said, "Don't cry, 
Here comes your mother with those two little guys"
Her mean mother steps and says to me 
Hit Sally in the face and decked her in the 
Punched her in the belly, and stepped on her 
Slammed the child on the hard concrete
The bitch was strong, the kids was gone.
Something was wrong I said what was going on?
I tried to break it up I said, stop it, leave her
She said, "If I can't have you 
She grabbed me closely by my socks
So I broke the hell out like I had the chicken pox
But uh, she gave chase, she caught up quick
She put a finger in the face of MC Rick, and said
So we can go cruising in my OJ, and what?
I'll give you all my love today.
What? Ricky Ricky Ricky what? 
Somehow your words just hypnotize me
And I just love your jazzy ways
Yo MC Rick my love is here to stay"
And on and on and on she kept on
The bitch been around before my mother's born
I said, "Cheer up!" I gave her a kiss
I said, "You can't have me I'm too young for you miss"
She said, "No you're not," then she starts crying
I says, "I'm thirty-four", she says, 
I said, "I am -- go ask my mother
And with your wrinkled pussy, I can't be your lover!"
To the tick tock and you don't stopf
To the tick tick ya don't... hit it!
Doug E. Fresh y'all, give him a round of applause y'all,
Doug E. Fresh! 
Yea, what up?Ah yeah, here's another Gangstarr sure shot, featuring the one and 
only, uh heh heh heh handly handly boy, Nice & Smooth, hey, hey,
HEY, HEY!!!!
Ganstarr has got to be da sure shot
Nice & Smooth has got to be da sure shot
Greg Nice!!! Greg N-I-C-E
Droppin dem basso, ah oui oui
Rock for a fee, not for free
Maybe I'll do it for charity
Now my employer or my employee
Is makin Greg N-I-C-E very M-A-D
Don't ever ever think of jerkin me
I work to hard for my royalty
Put lead in ya ass and drink a cup of tea
Peace to Red Alert and Kid Capri
Ooohh la la ah oui oui, I say Muhammad Ali, ya say Cassius Clay
I say butter you say Parkay
It's alright if ya wanna make a sway
I'm a way up town, took duece to the tre
I originate, they duplicate
I praise the lord and keep the faith
It's alright keep bitin at da bait
'92, uh!!, one year later
Peace out Premier take me out wit da fader
I chant eenie meenie, minie moe
I wreck da mic like a pimp pimps hoes
Here's how it goes I am a genius I mean this
I shake this you'll take this
I'm kinda fiendish
You wish that you could come into my neighborhood
Meaning my mental state
Still I'm 5 foot 8
Crazy as I wanna be
Cause I make it orderly
You could say I'm sorta da boss so get lost
The brotha dat will make you change opinions
Dominions I'm in them when it's time to kick shit from
The heart, plus I get a piece of the action
I'm feelin satisfaction from the street crowd reaction
Chumps pull guns when they feel afraid, too late
When they dip in the kick they get sprayed
Lemonade was a popular drink and in still is
I get more props den stunts den Bruce Willis
A poet like Langston Hughes and can't lose when I cruise
Out on the expressway
Leavin the Bodega I say "suave"
Premier's got more beats den barns got hay
Clips are inserted into my gun
So I can take the money, neva have ta run
I left my Phillie at home
Do you have another?
I wanna get blunted my brother
Now may I make a mark
Then make a spark over this phat track
Or should I say dope beat
Subtract, delete
All of the wick wack that wanna be abstract
But they lack the new knack that's comin from way way back
Hey yo Premier, please pass that buddha sack
You hear we quit?
No way, bullshit
I told ya before we come back wit more hits
I provide bright flava, so you could sketch me
Do me a favor, dont try and catch me
Slightly ahead of the game, I'm not a lame
Ask him, he'll tell you the same he knows my name
Smooth, I drop jewels like, paraphenalia
I'm infallable, not into failure
Like a rhinocerus, my speed is prosperous
And pure knowledge expands from my esophagus
I write here tonite to bring truth to the light
My dialogue is my own cause Smooth B will neva bite Kray, Lay
 Whattup Wish?
 You know how we used to get that vibe, back in the day?
 Oh yeah, most definitely
 Yeah!
 Yeah...
 I remember that
 Me too
 You know we used to get our hustle on, from the 1st to the 15th?
 Aw man, we touched alot of people with this one!
 A whole lotta people with this one!
 Whoa... that was deep!
 That was from the heart, dog
 Aw man, this was that street right here...
 Y'all remember? This was that street right here!
 East 99...
 Let's VIBE!
 Now we done blew up, fell off, but came right back up from grindin overtime!
 And you know what's real, we used to wear each other's shoes - what's yours, you know is mine
 Mine too! Can't deny, how the time fly by, it feel like it was just yesterday!
 When we was in the streets, stressed for llell, now we pullin up in big Escalades
 All paid for, money on the wood, so it's no car notes
 We far from broke, that's all I know
 So you better get it right when it comes to my folks, cause we gon ball out
 Blow a little bit of weed, smoke y'all out
 We get everybody goin off our style...
 Show 'em out to do it, thugsta stay right
 He ain't rollin how I roll when I ride!
 We gon' suit up again, incase y'all want war
 Gon' do it again, until we can't no more
 Blowin in the wind with a refreshin blow
 Who knew in the end, that we would be so cold
 It was hard, yup, no, but we can't let go, no
 Middle finger to the po-po! It's that thuggish-ruggish
 And the whole world love it, we gon' give it to 'em like, like!
 Round and round and round we go
 Now you can ride my vibe...
 Now just vibe, just vibe, just vibe
 My vibe, my vibe, my vibe...
 Come and get on the level with me, a regular G's
 Uncomparable, none like these...
 Unpredictable, harmonies...
 Mystic, lyrical, gotsta be... Bone, Bone!
 Cause we make the songs!
 No matter what you're feelin, you can vibe out to Bone!
 Straight off the dome!
 Up in it playa, let's go, flow so strong!
 No matter how we do it we gon' always keep it real
 Even when the higher powers wanna ban our noise
 It'll be back to the block with some rocks and a radio
 Reppin on a corner like the bandaid boys
 Boy, runnin around, puttin it down - flowin!
 Niggaz was wild, we did it all - knowin!
 We was the coldest in the city we showed em
 How to get it crackin like a real true soldier!
 Doin' our thing, since back in the day-day
 Chasin change, we gonna make it either way-way
 One-way bus tickets, Eazy listened and
 Flied us back to the block, now he's gone
 Now I got a little money in my pocket, about a couple G's
 It's been a long time since I got it from the streets
 I ain't worried about a beef, but I do keep heat
 Incase these haters ain't vibin with me!
 Round and round and round we go
 Now you can ride my vibe
 Now just vibe, just vibe, just vibe
 My vibe, my vibe, my vibe...
 Now tell me who the realest niggaz ever heard...
 Gotta be them Bone boys, listen and learn
 I know they can't believe it, but it's still our turn
 So let's get POD'd and tweeded, tweeded, off herb...
 We stay high, high, all day long, in the mornin when I open my eyes!
 So it ain't no big surprise, how they ride the vibe and get hypnotized!
 Took in by flow, they bank potent like dro...
 After one toke they want some more... they can't let go!
 Still get it on the low - if it's right there, I can't let that go
 I'm a hustler, survivor, strugglin, no lie, on dollars plus more!
 If you really need to know, Mr. Bill Collector's alive
 Step on the scene, collect my green
 Gimme everything that you got, cause I really wanna go!
 Round and round and round we go
 Now you can ride my vibe
 Now just vibe, just vibe, just vibe
 My vibe, my vibe, my vibe...
 Man I remember when we used to try to catch that vibe off that Banana Red
 Man we used to drink that motherfuckin Thunderbird with the Kool-Aid in it
 Ah-ho man, but remember Olde E and Crazy Horse?
 Aw, that shit dog, but you know what was crazy, the Chuggalo!
 Oh man, we used to sit around, and put everything in one thang and just DRINK it!
 Man, everybody put that candle in the middle, boy we used to be vibed out
 Haha!
 Hit up magic man for them dime sacks, bout fifteen joints
 But you know what, it wasn't nothing like that Sisco!
 Ooooh, that Sisco, that Wild Isles Rose was that shit though
 That, put that hair on ya chest...You know I'm slippin'
Girl you got me trippin'
All the love you're givin'
You know
You're so good to me
I don't know
What you do to me
I never thought this is
Where I'd be
Every day is like
Hide and seek
But I know where you are
My heart is racin'
Anticipatin'
No way I can fake it
I've fallen much too far
I made a promise to myself
That I'd never let someone
Ever get this close
But every time
I'm in your arms
My world turns upside down
You know I'm slippin'
Girl you got me trippin'
All the love you're givin'
You know
You're so good to me
You know I'm slippin'
Every time we're kissin'
You've got
What I've been missin'
You make my heart complete
You know I'm slippin'
You give me everything
A man could need
I'm caught on fire
By the way you please
You're the one
In my fantasy
Every night
You're in my dreams
My mind must be
Playing tricks
I never thought
That you'd exist
I don't know what
To make of this
Are you really
What you seem
I made a promise to myself
That I'd never let someone
Ever get this close
But every time
I'm in your arms
My world turns upside down
It took a while
Before I noticed you
I wasn't willing
To let you through
I can't imagine
How things would be
If you didn't come along
And set me freeyo you don't even know about this girl i met last night
she was bad
you've never seen nothing like it, trust me
who be your casanova
and we don't stop dr dr dr dr drop the flava
who be your casanova
craig david o yeah and we don't stop
craig david on the rise
craig david on the rise
stepped in the club now
saw you sitting with your friends gigglin
lookin at me
had to make my move
so i whispered in her ear
that i'll be your casanova
come dance while you think it over
we made our way over to the dance floor
gotta groove on
dancing yeah real hard core
from the front to the back that's where i was at
you know you know south hamptons mans do it like that
my body all over your 
damn sure
she was irresistable
the future was foreseeable
 last night ooh yeah
a pretty young girl i met
oh yeah come on 
 last night
a pretty young girl i met
craig david on the rise
girl you had me tripping
girl you've got me tripping
my heart was feenin from the beginning
just to hold your body drove me crazy
and it weren't like i had to pretend
that i'll be a casanova
if you'd only let me show ya
felt like a drink so we went to the bar
next thing we found ourselves in the back of my car
making laugh and giggle..ha ha
my body all over your
i didn't want to take it too far
especially in the car
got more respect for ya 
ooh yeah, now you're my partner
 last night ooh yeah
a pretty young girl i met
oh yeah come on 
 last night
a pretty young girl i met
craig david on the rise
i met this girl with the brown eyes
made my moves
showed enterprise that craig david's on the rise
it's all about the fly women
good looking women
those women i can't begin telling
senorita that's the life you live
that makes you wanna
leave the one you're with
and this is how i'm droppin it down
this pretty young girl turned my life around
pretty young lady, driving me crazy
pretty young lady, driving me crazy
 last night ooh yeah
a pretty young girl i met
oh yeah come on 
 last night
a pretty young girl i met
craig david on the rise
who be your casanova
and we don't stop dr dr dr dr drop the flava
who be your casanova
craig david o yeah and we don't stop
dr dr dr dr drop the flava
who be your casanova
craig david and we don't stop
craig david on the riseYou are appreciated
      
When I was young me and my mama had beef
Seventeen years old kicked out on the streets
Though back at the time, I never thought I'd see her face
Ain't a woman alive that could take my mama's place
Suspended from school; and scared to go home, I was a fool
with the big boys, breakin all the rules
I shed tears with my baby sister
Over the years we was poorer than the other little kids
And even though we had different daddy's, the same drama
When things went wrong we'd blame mama
I reminice on the stress I caused, it was hell
Huggin on my mama from a jail cell
And who'd think in elementary?
Heeey! I see the penitentiary, one day
And runnin from the police, that's right
Mama catch me, put a whoopin to my backside
And even as a crack fiend, mama
You always was a black queen, mama
I finally understand
for a woman it ain't easy tryin to raise a man
You always was committed
A poor single mother on welfare, tell me how ya did it
There's no way I can pay you back
But the plan is to show you that I understand
You are appreciated
Lady... 
Don't cha know we love ya?  Sweet lady
Dear mama
Place no one above ya, sweet lady
You are appreciated
Don't cha know we love ya?
Now ain't nobody tell us it was fair
No love from my daddy cause the coward wasn't there
He passed away and I didn't cry, cause my anger
wouldn't let me feel for a stranger
They say I'm wrong and I'm heartless, but all along
I was lookin for a father he was gone
I hung around with the Thugs, and even though they sold drugs
They showed a young brother love
I moved out and started really hangin
I needed money of my own so I started slangin
I ain't guilty cause, even though I sell rocks
It feels good puttin money in your mailbox
I love payin rent when the rent's due
I hope ya got the diamond necklace that I sent to you
Cause when I was low you was there for me
And never left me alone because you cared for me
And I could see you comin home after work late
You're in the kitchen tryin to fix us a hot plate
Ya just workin with the scraps you was given
And mama made miracles every Thanksgivin
But now the road got rough, you're alone
You're tryin to raise two bad kids on your own
And there's no way I can pay you back
But my plan is to show you that I understand
You are appreciated
Pour out some liquor and I reminsce, cause through the drama
I can always depend on my mama
And when it seems that I'm hopeless
You say the words that can get me back in focus
When I was sick as a little kid
To keep me happy there's no limit to the things you did
And all my childhood memories
Are full of all the sweet things you did for me
And even though I act craaazy
I gotta thank the Lord that you made me
There are no words that can express how I feel
You never kept a secret, always stayed real
And I appreciate, how you raised me
And all the extra love that you gave me
I wish I could take the pain away
If you can make it through the night there's a brighter day
Everything will be alright if ya hold on
It's a struggle everyday, gotta roll on
And there's no way I can pay you back
But my plan is to show you that I understand
You are appreciated
Sweet lady
And dear mama
Dear mama
Lady So what you gonna do cat daddy?
 I don't know dawg..juss trying to live it one day at a time.
I hear you man, live it one day at a time...
  Let me get up outta here man my ride waitin'.
Aiight cat daddy stay tru
 Aiight man peace
He greets his father with his hands out
Rehabilitated slightly, glad to be the man's child
The world is different since he's seen it last
Out of jail in seven years and he's happy that he's free at last
All he had was his mother's worth
Now she's gone and he's gotta make a change and make it for the beddah
But he's back so he's got one strike against him
And he's young plus he came up in the system
But he's smart and he's finally makin' eighteen
And this goes to get on top and try to stay clean
So he's calling up his homie who dun came up
Livin' like this now they dealin' with the same stuff
And had that attitude that who he was was worth it
and with that fucked up attitude he killed his first mate
Now it's different and he's dead as dirt
And realized that the name ain't coming up but it still hurt
And cain't nobody change this
It's ninteen-ninety-foe and we up against the same shit
I nevah understand why
I could nevah seen a man cry, til i seen that man die
Imagine life at it's full peak
Then imagine lying dead in the arms of your enemy
Imagine peace on this earth when there's no grief
Imagine grief on this earth when there's no peace
Cuz everybody's got a different way of endin' it
And when your number comes for service then they send it in
Now your time has arrived for the final touch
I see the fear in your eyes and hear your final breath
How much longeer will it be til it's all done?
Total darkness and ease be in all one
I watch him die and when he dies let us celebrate
You took his life, but your memory he'll never take
You'll be heade to another place
And the life you used to live will reflect in your mother's face
I hear you breathin' but your heart no longer sounds strong
But you kinda scared of dying so you hold on
And you keep on blacking out cuz the post is near
Stop trying to fight the reaper just relax and let it go
Because there's no way you can fight it but you'll still try
And you can try it til you fight it but you'll still die
Now your spirit leaves your body and your mind clears
The rigormortis starts to set, now you outta here
You start your journey into outer space
You see yourself in the light but you're still feeling outta place
So you standing in the tunnel of eternal light,
And you see the ones you never learn to love in life
Make the choice let it go but u can back it up
If you ain't at peace with God you need to patch it up
But if you ready close your eyes and we can set it free
There lies a man not scared to die, may he rest in peace
I still got to wondah why, 
I never seen a man cry til I seen a man die
...hope you feel beddah!!!Attention please, attention please!!
This shit here feels like a whole entire WORLD collapsed!
Motherfuckerrrrrrrrrr! Yeah, yeah, yeah  yeah!
Yeah  yeah  yeah 
Blunt blunt  blunt  blunt  blunt
Busta Rhymes now, M.O.P. now
What you want now? 
What you want now? 
What you want now? 
What you want now?
ANTE UP!! No, cut that fool!
They want to act stupid gun-butt that fool
When I cock that tool, nigga run your damn jewels
'fore we fuck around and lay you up in your own blood pool, nigga
Hunt you down nigga, run your ass down
Unleash the hounds til them niggaz'll gun your ass down 
You frontin like this was a thing of the past
With tattoos over the scars a nigga left on your ass!
My niggaz think lopsided, bust they gat cross-sided
In the subways they rob trains runnin along-side it!
 See motherfucker we don't play with that shit
And if you want your shit back you had to PAY for that shit!
You little costume niggaz, Romper-Room niggaz
Get you in the night or early in the afternoon niggaz
We takin your whole shit WHILE WE PASS THROUGH
Even the shirt off your back, nigga RUN THAT TOO
Yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah
I catch you backstage, give me the keys to the Escalade
You think you cute hoe? Take off them Gucci shades
I get my dogs to do you dirty, they all seven-thirty
Rock a ski-mask, whether it's June or February
I take your show money  take your 'dro money 
Yo yap that fool, cause I don't know money!
For my peeps that hate slow money; I put them in the industry
so they can come and take - all your money
Wish I could bring Pun back
 Bitch, run that!
 Bitch, run that!  Bitch, run that!
So keep actin like you don't know where the funds at
And I'ma show y'all motherfuckers where the guns at
ANTE UP!! Yo yap that bitch
She try to spaz out then smack that bitch
Hoe you don't be rhymin, you still memorizin
Remi want them God damn diamonds 
ANTE UP!! Yap that fool!
ANTE UP!! Kidnap that fool!
It's the perfect timin, you see the man shinin
Get up off them God damn diamonds 
ANTE UP!! Yap that fool!
ANTE UP!! Kidnap that fool!
Get him  get him, hit him  hit him
Yap him  yap him 
 ANTE UP!! Yap that fool!
 Fuck hip-hop, rip pockets, snatch jewels!
 ANTE UP!!
What? My whole family nuts
Run up yo' stash house, tie granny up
Make you strip butt-naked
Young buck got struck with the gun butt 
For tryin to tuck the necklace
I'm young hungry armed and reckless
On the streets with a death wish
Don't hide when you see me, I'm on the guestlist
 ANTE UP!!
Show no mercy; B.K., nigga, thirsty thirsty
We bang hollows, you misrepresentin
the game motherfucker you lame and your chain hollow
Hit him  hit him, flash the tech
Yap your chain, smash the lens in your specs
Listen.. it's, Lil' Fame right?
With that Brownsville mentality to Shanghai
Hey yo I'm firin out a coppertop city, with a whole empire
A clip full of blue-tips and a hand full of FIYAHH!
Eat deep dirt nigga 
It's Berk' I put in work until it hurt nigga 
Easy out the truck punk, 'fore I leave your ass leakin
I'ma bang til the springs in this thang start squeakin
Die cocksucker, boom BAP boom BAP
Aight motherfucker, what's wrong with you?Yo, We at war
We at war with terrorism, racism, and most of all we at war with ourselves
God show me the way because the Devil trying to break me down
 with me, with me, with me 
You know what the Midwest is?
Young & Restless
Where restless  might snatch your necklace
And next these  might jack your Lexus
Somebody tell these  who Kanye West is
I walk through the valley of the shadow of death is
Top floor the view alone will leave you breathless Uhhhh!
Try to catch it Uhhhh! It's kinda hard hard
Getting choked by the detectives yeah yeah now check the method
They be asking us questions, harass and arrest us
Saying "we eat pieces of shit like you for breakfast"
Huh? Yall eat pieces of shit? What's the basis?
We ain't going nowhere but got suits and cases
A truck full of crap rental car from Avis
My momma used to say only Jesus can save us
Well momma I know I act a fool
But I'll be gone 'til November I got packs to move I Hope
God show me the way because the Devil trying to break me down
The only thing that that I pray is that my feet don't fail me now
And I don't think there is nothing I can do now to right my wrongs
I want to talk to God but I'm afraid because we ain't spoke in so long
To the hustlers, killers, murderers, drug dealers even the strippers
To the victims of Welfare for we living in hell here hell yeah
Now hear ye hear ye want to see Thee more clearly
I know he hear me when my feet get weary
Cause we're the almost nearly extinct
We rappers are role models we rap we don't think
I ain't here to argue about his facial features
Or here to convert atheists into believers
I'm just trying to say the way school need teachers
The way Kathie Lee needed Regis that's the way I need Jesus
So here go my single dog radio needs this
They say you can rap about anything except for Jesus
That means guns, sex, lies, video tapes
But if I talk about God my record won't get played Huh?
Well let this take away from my spins
Which will probably take away from my ends
Then I hope this take away from my sins
And bring the day that I'm dreaming about
Next time I'm in the club everybody screaming out
God show me the way because the devil trying to break me down
The only thing that that I pray is that my feet don't fail me now
And I don't thing there's nothing I can do now to right my wrongs
I want to talk to God but I'm afraid because we ain't spoke in so longAh, push it
Ah, push it
Oooh, baby, baby
Baby, baby
Oooh, baby, baby
Baby, baby
Get up on this!
Ow! Baby!
Salt and Pepa's here!
(Now wait a minute, y'all
This dance ain't for everybody
Only the sexy people
So all you fly mothers, get on out there and dance
Dance, I said!)
Salt and Pepa's here, and we're in effect
Want you to push it, babe
Coolin' by day then at night working up a sweat
C'mon girls, let's go show the guys that we know
How to become number one in a hot party show
Now push it
Ah, push it - push it good
Ah, push it - push it real good
Ah, push it - push it good
Ah, push it - p-push it real good
Hey! Ow!
Push it good!
Oooh, baby, baby
Baby, baby
Oooh, baby, baby
Baby, baby
Push it good
Push it real good
Ah, push it
Ah, push it
Yo, yo, yo, yo, baby-pop
Yeah, you come here, gimme a kiss
Better make it fast or else I'm gonna get pissed
Can't you hear the music's pumpin' hard like I wish you would?
Now push it
Push it good
Push it real good
Push it good
P-push it real good
Ah, push it
Get up on this!
Boy, you really got me going
You got me so I don't know what I'm doing
Ah, push itI'm rated "R"...this is a warning, ya better void,
Poets are paranoid, DJ's D-stroyed,
Cuz I came back to attack others in spite-
Strike like lightnin', It's quite frightenin'!
But don't be afraid in the dark, in a park,
Not a scream or a cry, or a bark, more like a spark;
Ya tremble like a  alcoholic, muscles tighten up,
What's that, lighten up! You see a sight but,
Suddenly you feel like your in a horror flick,
You grab your heart then wish for tomorrow quick!
Music's the clue, when I come your warned,
Apocolypse Now, when I'm done, ya gone!
Haven't you ever heard of a MC-murderer?
This is the death penalty,and I'm servin' a
death wish, so come on, step to this
hysterical idea for a lyrical professionist!
Friday the thirteenth, walking down Elm Street,
you come in my realm ya get beat!
This is off limits, so your visions are blurry,
All ya see is the meters at a volume, 
pumping Lyrics of Fury!
it's a ....fearified freestyle!
Terror in the styles, never error-files,
indeed I'm known-your exiled!
For those that oppose to be level or next to this...
I ain't a devil and this ain't the Exorcist!
worse than a nightmare, you don't have to sleep a wink,
the pain's a migraine every time ya think,
Flashbacks interfere, ya start to hear:
The R-A-K-I-M in your ear;
Then the beat is hysterical,
that makes Eric go get a ax and chops the wack,
soon the lyrical format is superior,
faces of death remain, 
MC's decaying, cuz they never stayed,
the scene of a crime every night at the show,
the fiend of a rhyme on the mic that you know,
It's only one capable, breaks-the unbreakable,
melodies-unmakable, pattern-unecscapable,
a horn if want the style I posses, 
I bless the child, the earth, the gods and bomb the rest,
for those that envy a MC it can be,
hazardous to your health so be friendly,
a matter of life and death, just like a ethch-a-sketch,
shake 'till your clear, make it disappear, make the next,
after the ceremony, let the rhyme rest in peace,
if not, my soul'll release!
the scene is recreated, reincarnated, updated, I'm glad you made it,
cuz your about to see a disasterous sight,
a performance never again performed on a mic:
Lyrics of fury!
a fearified freestyle!
the "R" is in the house-too much tension!
Make sure the system's loud when I mention
Phrases that's fearsome...
You want to hear some sounds that not only pounds but please your eardrums;
I sit back and observe the whole scenery, 
then nonchalantly tell you what it mean to me,
strictly business I'm quickly in this mood,
and I don't care if the whole crowd's a witness!
I'm a tear you apart but I'm a spare you a heart,
program into the speed of the rhyme, prepare to start,
rhythm's out of the radius, insane as the craziest
musical madness MC ever made, see it's
now an emergency, open-heart surgery...
open your mind, you will find every word'll be
furier than ever, I remain the furture,
battle's tempting...whatever suits ya!
For words the sentence, there's no resemblance,
you think you're ruffer, then suffer the consequences!
I'm never dying-terrifying results,
I wake ya with hundreds of thousands of volts,
mic-to-mouth resuscitation, rhythm with radiation,
novicane ease the pain it might save him,
if not, Eric B.'s the judge, the crowd's the jury...
How do I plead to homicide?
Lyrics of Fury!
they're getting furier! a fearified freestyle!Army with harmony
Dave drop a load on 'em    
OPP, how can I explain it
I'll take you frame by frame it
To have y'all jumpin' shall we singin' it
O is for Other, P is for People scratchin' temple
The last P...well...that's not that simple
It's sorta like another way to call a cat a kitten
It's five little letters that are missin' here
You get on occassion at the other party
As a game 'n it seems I gotta start to explainin'
Bust it
You ever had a girl and met her on a nice hello
You get her name and number and then you feelin' real mellow
You get home, wait a day, she's what you wanna know about
Then you call up and it's her girlfriend or her cousin's house
It's not a front, F to the R to the O to the N to the T
It's just her boyfriend's at her house 
It's OPP, time other people's what you get it
There's no room for relationship there's just room to hit it
How many brothers out there know just what I'm gettin' at
Who thinks it's wrong 'cos I'm splittin' and co-hittin' at
Well if you do, that's OPP and you're not down with it
But if you don't, here's your membership
You down with OPP  
Who's down with OPP  
You down with OPP  
Who's down with OPP  
As for the ladies, OPP means something gifted
The first two letters are the same but the last is something  
different
It's the longest, loveliest, lean- I call it the leanest
It's another five letter word rhymin' with cleanest and meanest
I won't get into that, I'll do it...ah...sorta properly
I say the last P...hmmm...stands for property
Now lady here comes a kiss, blow a kiss back to me, now tell me  
exactly
Have you ever known a brother who have another like ah girl or wife
And you just had to stop and just 'cos he look just as nice
You looked at him, he looked at you and you knew right away
That he had someone but he was gonna be yours anyway
You couldn't be seen with him and honestly you didn't care
'Cos in a room behind a door no one but y'all are there
When y'all are finish, y'all can leave and only y'all would know
And then y'all could throw the skeleton bones right in the closet do'
Now don't be shocked 'cos if you're down I want your hands up high
Say OPP  I like to say with pride
Now when you do it, do it well and make sure that it counts
You're now down with a discount
You down with OPP  
Who's down with OPP 
You down with OPP  
Who's down with OPP 
This girl ah tried to OPP me
I had a girl and she knew that matter-of-fact my girl was partner's  
that
Had a fall out, disagreement, yeah an argument
She tried to do me so we did it in my apartment, bust it
That wasn't the thing it must have been the way she hit the ceiling
'Cos after that she kept on coming back and catchin' feelings
I said, "Let's go my girl is coming so you gotta leave"
She said, "Oh no, I love you Treach" I said, "Now child please"
You gots to leave, come grab your coat, right now you gotta go
I said now look you to the stairs and to the stairwindow
This was a thing, a little thing, you shouldn't have put your heart
'Cos you know I was OPP, hell from the very start
Come on, come on, now let me tell you what it's all about
When you get down, you can't go 'round runnin' off at the mouth
That's rule number one in this OPP establishment
You keep your mouth shut and it won't get back to her or him
Exciting isn't it, a special kinda business
Many of you will catch the same sorta OPP is you with
Him or her for sure is going to admit it
When OPP comes, damn-- skippy I'm with it
You down with OPP    
Who's down with OPP 
You down with OPP    
Who's down with OPP 
Break it down!Man we gotta go get something to eat man
I'm hungry as a motherfucker
Ay yo man, damn what's taking homie so long son?
50, calm down, here he come
Ahh, ohh, what the fuck!?
Ahh! son, pull up! pull up!
Many men, wish death upon me
Blood in my eye dawg and I can't see
I'm trying to be what I'm destined to be
And niggas trying to take my life away
I put a hole in a nigga for fucking with me
My back on the wall, now you gon' see
Better watch how you talk, when you talk about me
'Cause I'll come and take your life away
Many men, many, many, many, many men
Wish death upon me
Lord I don't cry no more
Don't look to the sky no more
Have mercy on me
Now these pussy niggas putting money on my head
Go on and get your refund motherfucker, I ain't dead
I'm the diamond in the dirt, that ain't been found
I'm the underground king and I ain't been crowned
When I rhyme, something special happen every time
I'm the greatest, something like Ali in his prime
I walk the block with the bundles
I've been knocked on the humble
Swing the ox when I rumble
Show your ass what my gun do
Got a temper nigga, go'head, lose your head
Turn your back on me, get clapped and lose your legs
I walk around gun on my waist, chip on my shoulder
Till I bust a clip in your face, pussy, this beef ain't over
Many men, many, many, many, many men
Wish death upon me
Lord I don't cry no more
Don't look to the sky no more
Have mercy on me
Have mercy on my soul
Somewhere my heart turned cold
Have mercy on many men
Many, many, many, many men
Wish death upon me
Sunny days wouldn't be special, if it wasn't for rain
Joy wouldn't feel so good, if it wasn't for pain
Death gotta be easy, 'cause life is hard
It'll leave you physically, mentally, and emotionally scarred
This if for my niggas on the block, twisting trees and cigars
For the niggas on lock, doing life behind bars
I don't see only god can judge me, 'cause I see things clear
Quick these crackers will give my black ass a hundred years
I'm like Paulie in Goodfellas, you can call me the Don
Like Malcolm by any means, with my gun in my palm
Slim switched sides on me, let niggas ride on me
I thought we was cool, why you want me to die homie?
Many men, many, many, many, many men
Wish death upon me
Lord I don't cry no more
Don't look to the sky no more
Have mercy on me
Have mercy on my soul
Somewhere my heart turned cold
Have mercy on many men
Many, many, many, many men
Wish death upon me
Every night I talk to god, but he don't say nothing back
I know he protecting me, but I still stay with my gat
In my nightmares, niggas keep pulling techs on me
Psych says some bitch done, put a hex on me
The feds didn't know much, when Pac got shot
I got a kite from the pens that told me, Tuck got knocked
I ain't gonna spell it out for you motherfuckers all the time
Are you illiterate nigga? You can't read between the lines
In the bible it says, what goes around, comes around
Hommo shot me three weeks later he got shot down
Now it's clear that I'm here, for a real reason
'Cause he got hit like I got hit, but he ain't fucking breathing
Many men, many, many, many, many men
Wish death upon me
Lord I don't cry no more
Don't look to the sky no more
Have mercy on me
Have mercy on my soul
Somewhere my heart turned cold
Have mercy on many men
Many, many, many, many men
Wish death upon meI don't wanna write this down, 
I wanna tell you how I feel right now 
I don't wanna take no time to write this down, 
I wanna tell you how I feel right now, hey 
Tomorrow may never come
For you or me
Life is not promised
Tomorrow may never show up
For you and me
This life is not promised
I ain't no perfect man
I'm trying to do, the best that I can,
With what it is I have
I ain't no perfect man
I'm trying to do, the best that I can,
With what it is I have
Put my heart and soul into this song 
I hope you feel me
From where I am, to wherever you are
I mean that sincerely
Tomorrow may never come
For and me
Life is not promised
Tomorrow may never appear
You better hold this very moment very close to you 
Very close to you 
So close to you, So- close to you 
Don't be affraid, to let it shine
My Umi said shine your light on the world
Shine your light for the world to see
My Abi said shine your light on the world
Shine your light for the world to see
My Abi said shine your light on the world
Shine your light for the world to see
My Umi said shine your light on the world
Shine your light for the world to see
Sometimes I get discouraged
I look around and, things are so weak
People are so weak
Sometimes,
Sometimes I feel like crying
Sometimes my heart gets heavy
Sometimes I just want to leave and fly away 
Sometimes I don't know what to do with myself 
Passion takes over me
I feel like a man
Going insane
Losing my brain
Trying to maintain
Doing my thang
Hey hey hey hey hey
Put my heart and soul into this y'all
I hope you feel me
Where I am, to wherever you are 
Sometimes I don't want to be bothered
Sometimes I just want a quiet life, with
Me and my babies, me and my lady
Sometimes I don't want to get into no war
Sometimes I don't wanna be a soldier
Sometimes I just wanna be a man, but
Umi said shine your light on the world
Shine your light for the world to see
My Abi said shine your light on the world
Shine your light for the world to see
My dreamers said shine your light on the world
Shine your light for the world to see
My elders said shine your light on the world 
Shine your light for the world to see
I want black people to be free, to be free, to be free
All my people to be free, to be free, to be free
Oh black people to be free, to be free, to be free
Oh black people to be free, to be free, to be free
That's all that matters to me 
Black people unite and let's all get down
Gotta have what,
Gotta have that love
Peace and understanding
One God, one light
One man, one voice, one mic
Black people unite come on and do it right
Black people unite come on and do it right
Black people unite come on and get down
Gotta have what,
Love, peace and understanding
One God, one voice, one life
One man, gon' shine my light
Black people unite, now hop up and do it right
Black people unite, now come on and do it right
Yeah baby that's what I like
Yeah baby that's what I like
Yeah baby that's what I like...I'm making short term goals, wonder whether foes
just put away the leathers and put ice on the gold
chilly with enough bail money to free a big Willy
high stakes, I got more at stake than Philly
shopping sprees, coping three, deuce fever I guess its fully loaded,
ah yes,
bouncing in the lex luger, tires smoke like Buddha
50 g's to the crap shooter,
niggas can't fade me
chrome socks beaming, through my peripheral I see ya scheming
stop dreamin', I leave ya body steaming
niggas is feening, what's the meaning
I'm leaning on any nigga intervening with the sound of my money machine-in
my cuff running over with hundreds
I'm one of the best niggas that done it
six digits and running,
y'all niggas don't want it
I got the godfather flow, the don Juan Demarco
swear to god, don't get it fucked up
taking out this time
to give you a piece of my mind
but though you think you are
baby one day you'll be a star
last seen out of state where I drop my slang
I'm deep in the south kicking up top game
bouncing on the highway switching 4 lanes
screaming through the sun roof money ain't a thang
your worst fear confirmed,
me and my fam roll tight like the firm
getting down for life, that's right, you better learn
why play with fire, burn
we get together like a choir
to acquire what we desire
we do dirt like worms
produce g's like sperm
'til legs spread like germs
I got extensive hoes, with expensive clothes
and I sip wine, and spit vintage flows
but y'all don't know......
yeah, yeah, yeah, yeah,
cause you can't knock the hustle
but until that day then
I'm the one whose crazy
cause that's the way ya making me feel
I'm just trying to get mine,
I don't have the time
to knock the hustle for real
y'all niggas lunching, punching a clock
my function is lo make much 'n' lay back munching
sipping Remy on rocks, my crew
something to watch nothing to stop
un...
...stoppable
scheme on the ice, I gotta hide your crew
I gotta
let you niggas know the time like movado
my motto,
stack rocks like Colorado
bottle off the champagne, crystals by the bottle
it's a damn shame what you're not though  me slick like a GATO fuckin' Jay-Z
pops knew exactly what he did when he made me
tried to get a nut and he got a nut and what
straight banana's
can a nigga, see me
got the US Open, advantage jigga
serve like sampras, play fake a rappers like a campus Le Tigre,
son you're too eager
you ain't having it? good, me either
lets get together and make this whole world believers
at my arraignment, screaming
all these blacks got is sports and entertainment, until we even
thieving, as long as I'm breathing
can't knock the way a nigga eating
fuck you even
taking out this time
to give you a piece of my mind
but though you think you are
baby one day you'll be a star
but until that day then
I'm the one whose crazy
cause that's the way ya making me feel,
I'm just trying to get mine, I don't have the time
to knock the hustle for realThe revolution will not be televised
The revolution is here
Yeah, it's Common Sense, with DJ Premier
We gonna help y'all see clear
It's real hip-hop music, from the soul, y'all
Yeah, check it, yo
The perseverence of a rebel I drop heavier levels
It's unseen or heard, a king with words
Can't knock the hustle, but I've seen street dreams deferred
Dark spots in my mind where the scene occured
Some say I'm too deep, I'm in too deep to sleep
Through me, Muhammed will forever speak
Greet brothers with handshakes in ghetto landscapes
Where a man is determined by how much a man make
Cop Cognacs and spit old raps with young cats
with cigarettes in their ear, niggerish they appear
Under the Fubu is a guru, that's untapped
Want to be in the rap race but ain't ran one lap
Ran so far from the streets that you can't come back
You tripping with nowhere to unpack, forgot that
"This is rap for real, something you feel"
"And you know, yes you know"
"Rap for the black people"
"Heeeeyyyy, heeeeeyyyy"
In front of two-inch glass and Arabs I order fries
Inspiration when I write, I see my daughter's eyes
I'm the truth, across the table from corporate lies
Immortilized by the realness I bring to it
If revolution had a movie I'd be theme music
My music, you either fight, fuck, or dream to it
My life is one big rhyme, I try to scheme through it
Through my shell, never knew what the divine would bring to it
I'd be lying if I said I didn't want millions
More than money saved, I wanna save children
Dealing with alcoholism and afrocentricity
A complex man drawn off of simplicity
Reality is frisking me
This industry will make you lose intensity
The Common Sense in me remembers the basement
I'm Morpheus in this hip-hop Matrix, exposing fake shit
Somedays I take the L to gel with the real world
Got on at 87th, stopped by this little girl
She recited raps, I forgot where they was from
In 'em, she was saying how she made brothers cum
I start thinking, how many souls hip-hop has affected
How many dead folks this art resurrected
How many nations this culture connected
Who am I to judge one's perspective?
Though some of that shit y'all pop true it, I ain't relating
If I don't like it, I don't like it, that don't mean that I'm hating
I just want to innovate and stimulate minds
Travel the world and penetrate the times
Escape through rhythms in search of peace and wisdom
Raps are smoke signals letting the streets know I'm with 'em
For now I appreciate this moment in time
Ball players and actors be knowing my rhymes, it's likeHeah hah hah!  
I'm serious nigga one of y'all niggaz got this ass motherfuckin up
Aiy baby, aiy baby... aiy baby get some bubblegum in this motherfucker
Steady long, steady long nigga
 
With so much drama in the L-B-C
It's kinda hard bein Snoop D-O-double-G
But I, somehow, some way
Keep comin up with funky ass shit like every single day
May I, kick a little something for the G's 
and, make a few ends as  I breeze, through
Two in the mornin and the party's still jumpin
cause my momma ain't home
I got bitches in the living room gettin it on
and, they ain't leavin til six in the mornin 
So what you wanna do, sheeeit
I got a pocket full of rubbers and my homeboys do too
So turn off the lights and close the doors
But  we don't love them hoes, yeah!
So we gonna smoke a ounce to this
G's up, hoes down, while you motherfuckers bounce to this
Rollin down the street, smokin indo, sippin on gin and juice
Laid back 
Now, that, I got me some Seagram's gin
Everybody got they cups, but they ain't chipped in
Now this types of shit, happens all the time
You got to get yours but fool I gotta get mine
Everything is fine when you listenin to the D-O-G
I got the cultivating music that be captivating he
who listens, to the words that I speak
As I take me a drink to the middle of the street
and get to mackin to this bitch named Sadie 
She used to be the homeboy's lady 
Eighty degrees, when I tell that bitch please
Raise up off these N-U-T's, cause you gets none of these
At ease, as I mob with the Dogg Pound, feel the breeze
beeeitch, I'm just
Later on that day
My homey Dr. Dre came through with a gang of Tanqueray
And a fat ass J, of some bubonic chronic that made me choke
Shit, this ain't no joke
I had to back up off of it and sit my cup down
Tanqueray and chronic, yeah I'm fucked up now
But it ain't no stoppin, I'm still poppin
Dre got some bitches from the city of Compton
To serve me, not with a cherry on top
Cause when I bust my nut, I'm raisin up off the cot
Don't get upset girl, that's just how it goes
I don't love you hoes, I'm out the do'
And I'll be
 
Rollin down the street, smokin indo, sippin on gin and juice 
Laid back 
Rollin down the street, smokin indo, sippin on gin and juice 
Laid back You know parents are the same no matter time nor place
They don't understand that us kids are gonna make some mistakes
So to you, all the kids all across the land
There's no need to argue, parents just don't understand
I remember one year
My mom took me school shopping
It was me, my brother, my mom, oh, my pop, and my little sister
All hopped in the car
We headed downtown to the Gallery Mall
MY mom started bugging with the clothes she chose
I didn't say nothing at first
I just turned up my nose
She said, "What's wrong? This shirt cost $20"
I said, "Mom, this shirt is plaid with a butterfly collar!"
The next half hour was the same old thing
My mother buying me clothes from 1963
And then she lost her mind and did the ultimate
I asked her for Adidas and she bought me Zips!
I said, "Mom, what are you doing, you're ruining my rep"
She said, "You're only sixteen, you don't have a rep yet"
I said, "Mom, let's put these clothes back, please"
She said "no, you go to school to learn not for a fashion show"
I said, "This isn't Sha Na Na, come on Mom, I'm not Bowzer
Mom, please put back the bell-bottom Brady Bunch trousers
But if you don't want to I can live with that but
You gotta put back the double-knit reversible slacks"
She wasn't moved - everything stayed the same
Inevitably the first day of school came
I thought I could get over, I tried to play sick
But my mom said, "No, no way, uh-uh, forget it"
There was nothing I could do, I tried to relax
I got dressed up in those ancient artifacts
And when I walked into school, it was just as I thought
The kids were cracking up laughing at the clothes Mom bought
And those who weren't laughing still had a ball
Because they were pointing and whispering
As I walked down the hall
I got home and told my Mom how my day went
She said, "If they were laughing you don't need them,
Cause they're not good friends"
For the next six hours I tried to explain to my Mom
That I was gonna have to go through this about 200 more times
So to you all the kids all across the land
There's no need to argue
Parents just don't understand
Oh-kay, here's the situation
My parents went away on a week's vacation and
They left the keys to the brand new Porsche
Would they mind?
Umm, well, of course not
I'll just take it for a little spin
And maybe show it off to a couple of friends
I'll just cruise it around the neighborhood
Well, maybe I shouldn't
Yeah, of course I should
Pay attention, here's the thick of the plot
I pulled up to the corner at the end of my block
That's when I saw this beautiful girlie girl walking
I picked up my car phone to perpetrate like I was talking
You should've seen this girl's bodily dimensions
I honked my horn just to get her attention
She said, "Was that for me?"
I said, "Yeah"
She said, "Why?"
I said, "Come on and take a ride with a helluva guy"
She said, "How do I know you're not sick?
You could be some deranged lunatic"
I said, "C'mon toots - my name is the Prince =
Beside, would a lunatic have a Porsche like this?"
She agreed and we were on our way
She was looking very good and so was I, I must say - word
We hit McDonald's, pulled into the drive
We ordered two Big Macs and two large fries with Cokes
She kicked her shoes off onto the floor
She said, "Drive fast, speed turns me on"
She put her hand on my knee, I put my foot on the gas
We almost got whiplash, I took off so fast
The sun roof was open , the music was high
And this girl's hand was steadily moving up my thigh
She had opened up three buttons on her shirt so far
I guess that's why I didn't notice that police car
We're doing ninety in my Mom's new Porsche
And to make this long story short - short
When the cop pulled me over I was scared as hell
I said, "I don't have a license but I drive very well, officer"
I almost had a heart attack that day
Come to find out the girl was a twelve-year-old runaway
I was arrested, the car was impounded
There was no way for me to avoid being grounded
My parents had to come off from vacation to get me
I'd rather be in jail than to have my father hit me
My parents walked in
I got my grip, I said, "Ah, Mom, Dad, how was your trip?"
They didn't speak - I said, "I want to plead my case"
But my father just shoved me in the car by my face
That was a hard ride home, I don't know how I survived
They took turns - one would beat me while the other was driving
I can't believe it, I just made a mistake
Well parents are the same no matter time nor place
So to you all the kids all across the land
Take it from me, parents just don't understandYo, pay attention
And listen real closely how I break this slang shit down
Check it, my weed smoke is my lye
A ki of coke is supply
When I'm lifted, I'm high
With new clothes on, I'm fly
Cars is whips and sneakers is kicks
Money is chips, movies is flicks
Also, cribs is homes, jacks is pay phones
Cocaine is nose candy, cigarettes is bones
A radio is a box, a razor blade is a ox
Fat diamonds is rocks and jakes is cop
And if you got rubbed, you got stuck
You got shot, you got bucked
And if you got double-crossed, you got fucked
Your bankroll is your poke, a choke hold is a yoke
A kite is a note, a con is a okey doke
And if you got punched that mean you got snuffed
To clean is to buff, a bull scare is a strong bluff
I know you like the way I'm freakin' it
I talk with slang and I'm a never stop speakin' it
 "Speak with criminal slang"
That's just the way that I talk, yo
 "Vocabulary spills, I'm ill"
Yo, yo
A burglary is a jook, a woof's a crook
Mobb Deep already explained the meanin' of shook
If you caught a felony, you caught a F
If you got killed, you got left
If you got the dragon, you got bad breath
If you 730, that mean you crazy
Hit me on the hip means page me
Angel dust is sherm, if you got AIDS, you got the germ
If a chick gave you a disease, then you got burned
Max mean to relax, guns and pistols is gats
Condoms is hats, critters is cracks
The food you eat is your grub
A victim's a mark
A sweat box is a small club, your tick is your heart
Your apartment is your pad
Your old man is your dad
The studio is the lab and heated is mad
I know you like the way I'm freakin' it
I talk with slang and I'm a never stop speakin' it
The iron horse is the train and champaign is bubbly
A deuce is a honey that's ugly
If your girl is fine, she's a dime
A suit is a fine, jewelry is shine
If you in love, that mean you blind
Genuine is real, a face card is a hundred dollar bill
A very hard, long stare is a grill
If you sneakin' to go see a girl, that mean you creepin'
Smilin' is cheesin', bleedin' is leakin'
Beggin is bummin, if you nuttin you comin
Takin' orders is sunnin', an ounce of coke is a onion
A hotel's a telly, a cell phone's a celly
Jealous is jelly, your food box is your belly
To guerrilla mean to use physical force
You took a L, you took a loss
To show off mean floss, uh
I know you like the way I'm freakin' it
I talk with slang and I'm a never stop speakin' it
Yeah, yeah
One love to my big brother, Big Lee
Holdin' it down
Yeah, Flamboyant for life
Yeah yeah, Flamboyant for lifeC'mon man
And with the local DBT news, LL Cool J with a triumphant comeback
But tonite...
Don't call it a comeback
I been here for years
Rockin my peers and puttin suckas in fear
Makin the tears rain down like a MON-soon
Listen to the bass go BOOM
Explosion, overpowerin
Over the competition, I'm towerin
Wreckin shop, when I drop these lyrics that'll make you call the cops
Don't you dare stare, you betta move
Don't ever compare
Me to the rest that'll all get sliced and diced
Competition's payin the price
I'm gonna knock you out 
Mama said knock you out 
Don't u call this a regular jam
I'm gonna rock this land
I'm gonna take this itty bitty world by storm
And I'm just gettin warm
Just like Muhummad Ali they called him Cassius
Watch me bash this beat like a skull
Cuz u know I had beef wit
Why do u riff with me, the maniac psycho
And when I pull out my jammy get ready cuz it might go
BLAAAAW, how ya like me now?
The river will not allow
U to get with, Mr. Smith, don't riff
Listen to my gear shift
I'm blastin, outlastin
Kinda like Shaft, so u could say I'm shaftin
Old English filled my mind
And I came up with a funky rhyme
Breakdown!
Shadow boxin when I heard you on the radio 
I just don't know
What made you forget that I was raw?
But now I got a new tour
I'm goin insane, startin the hurricane, releasin pain
Lettin you know that you can't gain, I maintain
Unless ya say my name
Rippin, killin
Diggin and drillin a hole
Pass the Ol' Gold
Shotgun blasts are heard
When I rip and kill, at WILL
The man of the hour, tower of power, I'll devour
I'm gonna tie you up and let you understand
That I'm not your average man
When I got a jammy in my hand
DAAAAAM! Oooooohh!
Listen to the way I slaaaaay, your crew
Damage  damage  damage  damage
Destruction, terror, and mayhem
Pass me a sissy so suckas I'll slay him
Farmers  Farmers 
I'm ready 
I think I'm gonna bomb a town 
Don't u neva, eva, pull my lever
Cuz I explode
And my nine is easy to load
I gotta thank God
Cuz he gave me the strength to rock
HARD! knock you out, mama said knock you outIt's another one of them ol' funky Cypress Hill things
YouknowhatI'msayin?
And it goes like thisss...
Hey don't miss out on what your passin
You're missin the hoota of the funky Buddha
Eluder or the fucked up styles to get wicked
So come on as cypress starts to kick it
Cuz we're like the outlaw stridin
Suckers are hidein
Jump behind the bush when they see me driving
by
Hangin out my window
And my magnum takin out some puto's
Acting kinda loco
I'm just another local
Kid from from the street getting paid for my
vocals
 Here is something you can't understand
 How I could just kill a man
 Here is something you can't understand 
 How I could just kill a man
Verse Two: Sen Dog, Be-Real
I been doin' all the dumb shit,
yo, because I bet it's comin' from it
I'm not gonna waste no time,
fuckin' around like I got ya hummin
Hummin'... comin' at cha...
And you know I had to gat ya.
Time for some action, just a fraction of friction
I got the clearance to run the interference
into your sattelite, shinin a battle light,
swing out the gat, and I know that will gat ya right.
Here's an example, just a little sample.
How I could just kill a man!
One-time tried to come in my home,
take my chrome, I said "Yo, it's on.
Take cover son, or you're ass-out.
How you like my chrome?", then I watched the rookie pass out.
Didn't have to blast him, but I did anyway...
Hahaha... that young punk had to pay.
So I just killed a man!
It's gonna be a long time before I finish
one of the many missions that I have to establish
To light my spliff, ignite ya with these sights
and if you ain't down: bullshit!
Say some punk try to get you for your auto,
Would you call the one-time, play the role model?
No, I think you play like a thug
Next hear the shot of a magnum slug
Hummin', comin' at cha
yeah ya know I'm gonna gat ya
How you know where I'm at when you haven't been where I've been,
understand where I'm coming from.
When you're up on the hill, in your big home
I'm out here, risking my dome.
Just for a bucket, or a fast ducat
just to stay alive, aiyyo I gotta say "fuck it".
 Here is something you can't understand
 How I could just kill a man
All I wanted was a Pepsi"So what's up man?
Cooling man"
"Chilling chilling?"
"Yo you know I had to call, you know why right?"
"Why?"
"Because, yo, I never ever call and ask, you to play something right?"
"Yeah"
"You know what I wanna hear right?"
"What you wanna hear?
I wanna hear that Wu-Tang joint"
"Wu-Tang again?"
"Ah yeah, again and again!"
 Wu-Tang Clan coming at you, protect your neck kid, so set it off the Inspector Deck
 watch your step kid 
I smoke on the mic like smoking Joe Frazier
The hell raiser, raising hell with the flavor
Terrorize the jam like troops in Pakistan
Swinging through your town like your neighborhood Spiderman
So uhh, tic toc and keep ticking
While I get you flipping off the shit I'm kicking
The Lone Ranger, code red, danger!
Deep in the dark with the art to rip charts apart
The vandal, too hot to handle
you battle, you're saying Goodbye like Tevin Campbell
Roughneck, Inspector Deck's on the set
The rebel, I make more noise than heavy metal
The way I make the crowd go wild, sit back relax won't smile
Rae got it going on pal, call me the rap assassinator
Rhymes rugged and built like Schwarzenegger
And I'm gonna get mad deep like a threat, blow up your project
Then take all your assets
Cause I came to shake the frame in half
With the thoughts that bomb, shit like math!
So if you wanna try to flip go flip on the next man
Cause I grab the clip and
Hit you with sixteen shots and more I got
Going to war with the melting pot hot
It's the Method Man for short Mr. Meth
Moving on your left, ah!
And set it off, get it off, let it off like a gat
I wanna break full, cock me back
Small change, they putting shame in the game
I take aim and blow that nigga out the frame
And like Fame, my style'll live forever
Niggaz crossing over, but they don't know no better
But I do, true, can I get a "sue"
Nuff respect due to the one-six-oh
I mean oh, you check out the flow
like the Hudson or PCP when I'm dusting
Niggaz off because I'm hot like sauce
The smoke from the lyrical blunt makes me 
Oh, what, grab my nut get screwed
Ow, here comes my Shaolin style
Sloop, B. A. Buh-B. Y. U
to my crew with the "sue"
watch your step kid 
 c'mon baby baby c'mon 
 Yo, you best protect your neck
First things first man you're fucking with the worst
I'll be sticking pins in your head like a fucking nurse
I'll attack any nigga who's slack in his mack
Come fully packed with a fat rugged stack
Shame on you when you stepped through to
The Ol Dirty Bastard straight from the Brooklyn Zoo
And I'll be damned if I let any man
Come to my center, you enter the winter
Straight up and down that shit packed jam
You can't slam, don't let me get fool on him man
The Ol Dirty Bastard is dirty and stinking
Ason, unique rolling with the night of the creeps
Niggaz be rolling with a stash
ain't saying cash, bite my style I'll bite your motherfucking ass!
For crying out loud my style is wild so book me
Not long is how long that this rhyme took me
Ejecting, styles from my lethal weapon
My pen that rocks from here to Oregon
Here's Mordigan, catch it like a psycho flashback
I love gats, if rap was a gun, you wouldn't bust back
I come with shit that's all types of shapes and sounds
And where I lounge is my stomping grounds
I give a order to my peeps across the water
To go and snatch up props all around the border
And get far like a shooting star
'cause who I am is dim in the light of Pablo Escobar
Point blank as I kick the square biz
There it is you're fucking with pros and there it goes
You chill with the feedback black we don't need that
It's ten o'clock hoe, where the fuck's your seed at?
Feeling mad hostile, ran the apostle
Flowing like Christ when I speaks the gospel
Stroll with the holy roll then attack the globe with the buckus style
the ruckus, ten times ten men committing mad sin
Turn the other cheek and I'll break your fucking chin
Slaying boom-bangs like African drums 
Coming around the mountain when I come
Crazy flamboyant for the rap enjoyment
My clan increase like black unemployment
Yeah, another one dare,
Tuh-took a genius  take us the fuck outta here
The Wu is too slamming for these Cold Killing labels
Some ain't had hits since I seen Aunt Mabel
Be doing artists in like Cain did Abel
Now they money's gettin stuck to the gum under the table
That's what you get when you misuse what I invent
Your empire falls and you lose every cent
For trying to blow up a scrub
Now that thought was just as bright as a 20-watt light bulb
Should've pumped it when I rocked it
Niggaz so stingy they got short arms and deep pockets
This goes on in some companies
With majors they're scared to death to pump these
First of all, who's your A&R
A mountain climber who plays an electric guitar
But he don't know the meaning of dope
When he's looking for a suit and tie rap
that's cleaner than a bar of soap
And I'm the dirtiest thing in sight
Matter of fact bring out the girls and let's have a mud fight
 You best protect your neck Break 'em off somethin
 Shit..
 Yo..
Yo.. uhh..
Just wakin up in the mornin gotta thank God
I don't know but today seems kinda odd
No barkin from the dog, no smog
And momma cooked a breakfast with no hog 
I got my grub on, but didn't pig out
Finally got a call from a girl I wanna dig out
 Hooked it up for later as I hit the do'
Thinkin will I live, another twenty-fo'
I gotta go cause I got me a drop top
And if I hit the switch, I can make the ass drop
Had to stop, at a red light
Lookin in my mirror and not a jacker in sight
And everything is alright
I got a beep from Kim, and she can fuck all night
Called up the homies and I'm askin y'all
Which park, are y'all playin basketball?
Get me on the court and I'm trouble
Last week fucked around and got a triple double
Freakin niggaz everyway like M.J.
I can't believe, today was a good day 
Drove to the pad and hit the showers
Didn't even get no static from the cowards
Cause just yesterday them fools tried to blast me
Saw the police and they rolled right past me
No flexin, didn't even look in a nigga's direction
as I ran the intersection
Went to $hort Dog's house, they was watchin Yo! MTV Raps
What's the haps on the craps?
Shake 'em up, shake 'em up, shake 'em up, shake 'em
Roll 'em in a circle of niggaz and watch me break 'em
with the seven, seven-eleven, seven-eleven
Seven even back do' Lil' Joe
I picked up the cash flow
Then we played bones, and I'm yellin domino
Plus nobody I know got killed in South Central L.A.
Today was a good day 
Left my nigga's house paid 
Picked up a girl been tryin to fuck since the 12th grade
It's ironic, I had the brew she had the chronic
The Lakers beat the Supersonics
I felt on the big fat fanny
Pulled out the jammy, and killed the punanny
And my dick runs deep, so deep
So deep put her ass to sleep
Woke her up around one
She didn't hesitate, to call Ice Cube the top gun
Drove her to the pad and I'm coastin
Took another sip of the potion hit the three-wheel motion
I was glad everything had worked out
Dropped her ass off and then chirped out
Today was like one of those fly dreams
Didn't even see a berry flashin those high beams
No helicopter looking for a murder 
Two in the mornin got the Fatburger 
Even saw the lights of the Goodyear Blimp
And it read, "Ice Cube's a pimp" 
Drunk as hell but no throwin up 
Half way home and my pager still blowin up
Today I didn't even have to use my A.K.
I got to say it was a good day 
Hey wait, wait a minute Pooh, stop this shit
What the fuck I'm thinkin about?How about some hardcore?
 
How about some hardcore?
For the fellas on the corner posted up 20 deep
With your ifth on your hip, ready to flip
Whenever you empty your clip, dip, trip your sidekick
You got skill, you best manage to chill
And do yourself a favor, don't come nowhere near the Hill
With that bullshit, word, money grip, it'll cost ya
Make you reminisce of Frank Nitty 'The Enforcer'
I move with M.O.P.'s Last Generation
Straight up and down, act like you want a confrontation
I packs my gat, I gotta stay strapped
I bust mines, don't try to sneak up on me from behind
Don't sleep, I get deep when I creep
I see right now I got to show you it ain't nothin sweet
Go get your muthafuckin hammer
And act like you want drama
I send a message to your mama
'Hello, do you know your one son left?
I had license to kill and he had been marked for death
He's up the Hill in the back of the building with two in the dome
I left him stiffer than a tombstone'
How about some hardcore?
 
How about some hardcore?
I used to pack sling shots, but now I'm packin heavy metal
A rugged underground freestyler
Is Li'l Fame, muthafucka, slap, Li'l Mallet
When I let off, it's a burning desire
Niggas increase the peace cause when I release it be rapid fire
For the cause I drop niggas like drawers
Niggas'll hit the floors from the muthafuckin .44's
I'm talkin titles when it's showtime
Fuck around, I have niggas call the injury help line
I bust words in my verse that'll serve
Even on my first nerve I put herbs to curbs
I ain't about givin niggas a chance
And I still raise shit to make my brother wanna get up and dance
Front, I make it a thrill to kill
Bringin the ruckus, it's the neighborhood hoods for the Hill that's real
Me and mics, that's unlike niggas and dykes
So who wanna skate, cause I'm puttin niggas on ice
Whatever I drop must be rough, rugged and hard more
 
How about some hardcore?
 
Yo, here I am  Get it on, cocksucker
That nigga Bill seem to be a ill black brother
I gets dough from the way I flow
And before I go
You muthafuckas gonna know
That I ain't nothin to fuck with - duck quick
I squeeze when I'm stressed
Them teflons'll tear through your vest
I love a bloodbath 
You can feel the wrath 
B-i-l-l-y D-a-n-z-e
n-i-e, me, Billy Danzenie
 Who's there? 
Li'l Fame who? 
Boom! Ease up off the trigger
It's aight, me and shorty go to gunfights
Together we bring the ruckus, right?
We trump tight, aight?
I earned mine, so I'm entitled to a title
 that means I'm homicidal
How about some hardcore?
 
Yo, I scream on niggas like a rollercoaster
To them wack muthafuckas, go hang it up like a poster
Niggas get excited, but don't excite me
Don't invite me, I'm splittin niggas' heads where the white be
Try to trash this, this little bastard'll blast it
Only puttin niggas in comas and caskets
I ain't a phoney, I put the 'mack' in a -roni
I leave you lonely 
Up in your anus, I pack steel that's stainless
We came to claim this, and Li'l Fame'll make you famous
I mack hoes, rock shows and stack dough
Cause I'm in effect, knockin muthafuckas like five-o
I'm catchin other niggas peepin, shit, I ain't sleepin
I roll deep like a muthafuckin Puerto-Rican
So when I write my competition looks sadly
For broke-ass niggas I make it happen like Mariah Carey
I got shit for niggas that roll bold
Li'l Fame is like a orthopedic shoe, I got mad soul
I'ma kill em before I duck em
Because yo, mother made em, mother had em and muthafuck em
Knowmsayin?
Li'l Fame up in this muthafucka
Givin shoutouts to my man D/R Period
Lazy Laz
My man Broke Ass Moe
The whole Saratoga Ave.
Youknowmsayin?
Representin for Brooklyn
Most of all my cousin Prince Leroy, Big Mal, rest in peace
Danzenie up in this muthafucka
I'd like to say what's up to the whole M.O.P.
Brooklyn, period
Them niggas that just don't give a fuck
Bet yo ass, nigga
Hey yo, this muthafuckin Babyface 
Aka O.G. Bu-Bang
Yo, I wanna say what's up to the whole muthafuckin M.O.P. boyyeeeWe used to be number 10 
Now we're permanent one, 
In the battle lost my finger, Mic became my arm 
Pistol nozzle hits your nasal, blood becomes lukewarm 
Tell the woman be easy Naah squeeze the Charmin 
Test Wyclef, see death flesh get scorned. 
Beat you so bad make you feel like you ain't wanna be born 
And tell your friends stay the hell out of my lawn. 
Chicken George became Dead George stealin' chickens from my farm. 
Damn, Another dead pigeon 
If your mafiosos then I'm bringin' on Haitian Sicilians 
Nobody's shootin', my body's made of hand grenade 
Girl bled to death while she was tongue-kissing a razor blade. 
That sounds sick maybe one eday I'll write a horror 
Blackula comes to the ghetto, jacks an ACURA 
Stevie Wonder sees Crack Babies Be-Coming Enemies of their own families. 
What's going on? 
Armageddon come you know we soon done 
Gun by my side just in case I gotta rump 
A boy on the side of Babylon, trying to front like he's down with Mount Zion. 
 
Oooh La La La, It's the way that we rock when we're doing our thang 
Oooh La La La, It's the natural LA that the Refugees Bring 
Oooh La La La La La La Lalala La Laaah, Sweeeeet Thing 
Yeah in saloons we drink Boone's and battle goons till high noon, 
Bust rap toons on flat spoons, take no shorts like poon poon's. 
See hoochies pop coochies, for Gucci's and Lucci 
Find me in my Mitsubishi, eatin' sushi, bumpin' Fugees. 
Hey Hey Hey 
Try to take the crew and we don't play play 
Say say say 
Like Paul McCartney, not hardly, 
ODD-ly enough 
I can see right through your bluff 
Niggas huff and they puff but they can't handle us, WE BUST 
Cause we fortified, I could never hide, seen "Cooley High", Cried when Cochise died. 
I'm twisted, black-listed by some other negroes, 
Don't remove my Polos on the first episode. 
Ha Ha Ha Ha, You shouldn't diss refugees, and 
Ha Ha Ha Ha, You whole sound set's bootie , and 
Ha Ha Ha Ha, You have to respect JERSEY, cause I'm superfly when I'm super-high on 
the Fu-Gee-La. 
Oooh La La La, It's the way that we rock when we're doing our thang 
Oooh La La La, It's the natural LA that the Refugees Bring 
Oooh La La La La La La Lalala La Laaah, Sweeeeet Thing 
I sit 90 degrees underneath palm trees, 
Smokin' beadies as I burn my calories, 
Brooklyn roof tops become Brooklyn tee-pees, 
Who that be, enemies, wanna see the death of me. 
From Hawaii to Hawthorne, I run marathons, like 
Buju Banton, I'm a true champion, like, 
Farakkhan reads his Daily Qu'ran it's a phenomenon, lyrics fast like Ramadan. 
What's goin' on 
Armageddon come you know we soon done 
Gun by my side just in case I gotta rump 
A boy on the side of Babylon, trying to front like he's down with Mount Zion. 
Oooh La La La, It's the way that we rock when we're doing our thang 
Oooh La La La, It's the natural LA that the Refugees Bring 
Oooh La La La La La La Lalala La Laaah, Sweeeeet ThingAnd so it was written, and after all these things,
I saw another angel come down from heaven
Having great power and the eath was lighted with his glory
And he cried mightily with the strong voice saying "Babylon the great has
fallen,
it's fallen and has become the habitation of devils
and the home to every fowl spirit and a cage of very unclean and hateful men"
What you see is what you get now
Xzibit never wait around for kick downs, get my own shit, blowe
Shot heard around the world
Uplift, bench press, arm curl, keep the structure of the temple
To make things simple my existance is to ripple through time
Only concern is what is mine, divine, never monkey shine
walkin' down the very thin line, holdin' wait, runnin' crazy in the streets,
yeah
Plus the company I keep work in overtime
while you oversleep don't wanna see none of this evil I speak
Around on the atlas, cume la matra, the super actress
You all get close-lined and pinned the mattress
All day, every day, every which way
Who said to can't have your take, you need a tune 
This is a hard time on planet earth
for what it's worth Xzibit stand station without reabilitation like this
Pimps, players, hoes, hustlers, willes thugs, ballers, busters,
gangstas, macks everyday, all day, shot callers, even high rollers keep it
moving
What you see is what you get now
The kinda style make the whole world go wow
Bless the child like a hoe who's on flesh 'n bone
and no matter where I roam I feel right at home	
What you see is what you get now
The kinda style make the whole world go wow
Bless the child like a hoe who's on flesh 'n bone
and no matter where I roam I feel right at home
And that's the real shit
You got more than you bargained for
Hit the floor I pull a fast one to let you know that today could be your last
one,
black, take your breath like an asthma attack
Just a slave like Flava Flav, you're blind to the fact
Mr. X to the Z the Liks and King T
guranteed to bring the house down naturally
Niggas knowin' no limits lime Master P
makin' you motherfuckin' bastards see,
what, a whole different breed of MC
Realize it's you against me, catch a three-hundred and sixty degree
roundhouse to the mouth right
and like the sun, make the hot shit shine bright
I feelin' like my whole life is a green light never turn red
'cause I strike like a rattle-snake, lock like a dread
Niggas wanna bump heads but they better off dead
Came crashin' through the door like the Feds, bring it
What you see is what you get now
The kinda style make the whole world go wow
Bless the child like a hoe who's on flesh 'n bone
and no matter where I roam I feel right at home
What you see is what you get now
The kinda style make the whole world go wow
Bless the child like a hoe who's on flesh 'n bone
and no matter where I roam I feel right at home
And that's the real shit
And yeah, everybody start to rush
Swingin' through is your friendly neighborhood lush
I crack your bottle than watch how Xzibit bust
I regulate like a killer with a nickel plate
Uh set it straight and start to shakin' you down, breakin' new ground,
construction work
heavy artilary, put your dick in the dirt
Stay alert, the game is rough so you might get hurt
Slug burnt through your jacket, through your sweater, through your shirt
Get cut from th belly up
I burnt the chain fast lane, suck my sugar cane
I'm tryin' to spart that niggas brain while you entertain trivial things,
material things, protected by the underground kings
who rule the land with an iron fist
The "Men In Black", if we flash can't remember shit
You cross me, I'll make you pay like the government, I wanna kill Sam
'cause my package came short 12 grames, get the picture
Pimps, players, hoes, hustlers, willes thugs, ballers, busters,
gangstas, macks everyday, all day, shot callers, even high rollers keep it
moving
What you see is what you get now
The kinda style make the whole world go wow
Bless the child like a hoe who's on flesh 'n bone
and no matter where I roam I feel right at home, yeah, yeah
What you see is what you get now
The kinda style make the whole world go wow
Bless the child like a hoe who's on flesh 'n bone
and no matter where I roam I feel right at home
What you see is what you get now
The kinda style make the whole world go wow
Bless the child like a hoe who's on flesh 'n bone
and no matter where I roam I feel right at home, yeah, yeah
What you see is what you get now
The kinda style make the whole world go wow
Bless the child like a hoe who's on flesh 'n bone
and no matter where I roam I feel right at home1989 the number another summer 
Sound of the funky drummer
Music hittin' your heart cause I know you got sould
Listen if you're missin' y'all
Swingin' while I'm singin'
Givin' whatcha gettin'
Knowin' what I know
While the Black bands sweatin'
And the rhythm rhymes rollin'
Got to give us what we want
Gotta give us what we need
Our freedom of speech is freedom or death
We got to fight the powers that be
Lemme hear you say
Fight the power
As the rhythm designed to bounce
What counts is that the rhymes
Designed to fill your mind
Now that you've realized the prides arrived
We got to pump the stuff to make us tough
from the heart
It's a start, a work of art
To revolutionize make a change nothin's strange
People, people we are the same
No we're not the same
Cause we don't know the game
What we need is awareness, we can't get careless
You say what is this?
My beloved lets get down to business
Mental self defensive fitness
 bum rush the show
You gotta go for what you know
Make everybody see, in order to fight the powers that be
Lemme hear you say...
Fight the Power
Elvis was a hero to most
But he never meant shit to me you see
Straight up racist that sucker was
Simple and plain
Mother fuck him and John Wayne
Cause I'm Black and I'm proud
I'm ready and hyped plus I'm amped
Most of my heroes don't appear on no stamps
Sample a look back you look and find
Nothing but rednecks for 400 years if you check
Don't worry be happy
Was a number one jam
Damn if I say it you can slap me right here
 lets get this party started right
Right on, c'mon
What we got to say
Power to the people no delay
To make everybody see
In order to fight the powers that beAs we proceed
to give you what you need
9 to 5 motherfuckers
get live motherfuckers 
As we proceed
to give you what you need
East coast motherfuckers
Bad Boy motherfuckers
BIG - Now turn the mics up
Turn that mic up, yea that beat is knockin
to that microphone
Turn that shit the fuck up
Uh, what?
Turn it up louder
Yea, uh
As we proceed, to give you
what you need
J.M. motherfuckers
J.M. motherfuckers
9 to 5 motherfuckers
Who shot ya?
Seperate the weak from the ob-solete
Hard to creep them Brooklyn streets
It's on nigga, fuck all that bickering beef
I can hear sweat trickling down your cheek
Your heartbeat soun like Sasquatch feet
Thundering, shaking the concrete
Finish it, stop, when I foil the plot
Neighbors call the cops said they heard mad shots
Saw me in the drop, three in the corner
Slaughter, electrical tape around your daughter
Old school new school need to learn though
I burn baby burn like Disco Inferno
Burn slow like blunts with ya-yo
Peel more skins than Idaho potato
Niggaz know, the lyrics molestin is takin place
Fuckin with B.I.G. it ain't safe
I make your skin chafe, rashes on the masses
Bumps and bruises, blunts and Landcruisers
Big Poppa smash fools, bash fools
Niggaz mad because I know that Cash Rules
Everything Around Me, two glock nines
Any motherfucker whispering about mines
And I'm, Crooklyn's finest
You rewind this, Bad Boy's behind this
As we proceed
to give you what you need
9 to 5 motherfuckers
get live motherfuckers
As we proceed
to give you what you need
East coast motherfuckers
Bad Boy motherfuckers
Get high motherfuckers
Get high motherfuckers
Smoke blunts motherfuckers
Get high motherfuckers
Ready to die motherfuckers
9 to 5 motherfuckers
I seen the light excite all the freaks
Stack mad chips, spread love with my peeps
Niggaz wanna creep, got ta watch my back
Think the Cognac and indo sack make me slack?
I switches all that, cock-sucker G's up
One false move, get swiss cheesed up
Clip to Tec, respect I demand it
Slip and break the, 11th Commandment
Thou shalt not fuck with raw C-Poppa
Feel a thosand deaths when I drop ya
I feel for you, like Chaka Khan I'm the don
Pussy when I want Rolex on the arm
You'll die slow but calm
Recognize my face, so there won't be no mistake
So you know where to tell Jake, lame nigga
Brave nigga, turned front page nigga
Puff Daddy flips daily
I smoke the blunts he sips on the Bailey's
on the rocks, tote glocks at christenings
And my cock, in the fire position and...
(Get live motherfuckers
Ready to Die motherfuckers)
C'mere, c'mere 
open your fucking mouth, open your... didn't I tell you
don't fuck with me?  c'mon man
Huh?
Didn't I tell you not to fuck with me?
  Look at you now
 Huh? 
 Can't talk with a gun in your mouth huh?
 Bitch-ass nigga, what?
 
 Who shot ya?
...to give you what you need
9 to 5 motherfuckers
Get live motherfuckers
Get high motherfuckers
Ready to Die motherfuckers
Hah!!
As we proceed...
...to give you what you need
9 to 5 motherfuckers
East coast motherfuckers
West coast motherfuckers...
West coast motherfuckers... hah!
As we proceed, to give you what you need
As we proceed
to give you what you need
Get live motherfuckers
9 to 5 motherfuckers
Get money motherfuckers
As we proceed
to give you what you need
Get live motherfuckers
9 to 5 motherfuckers
J.M. motherfuckers
J.M. motherfuckers
As we proceeeeeeed
To give you what you need...
9 to 5...These are the tales, the freaky tales...
The tales that I tell so well...
I met this girl, her name was Joan
She loved the way I rocked the microphone
When I met Joan, I took her home
She was just like a doggy all on my bone
I met another girl, her name was Ann
All she wanted was to freak with a man
When I met Ann, I soked her pans
We ended up freakin' by garbage can
The next young freak I met was Red
I took her to the house and she gave me head
She likes to freak was all she said
We jumped in the sheets and we broke my bed
There's another girl, her name is Mary
Talked about sex and the girl acted scary
I heard she was freakin' for my homeboy Jerry
Took her to the house and I popped that cherry
Young and tender, sweet Denise
Get her in the bed and the girl's a beast
I tell you, homeboy, If you get a piece
She only talks about signin' a lease
I met this tender, her name was Lori
And a X-rated movie wouldn't tell her story
She had a twinsister, her name was Lisa
And just like Lori, she's a real dick pleaser
My girlfriend's name was Michelle, I freaked her well
Her pussy got hotter than flames in hell
I geed this girl, her name was Tammy
I didn't wanna do it cause the bitch was flammy
She had a best friend, her name was Jane
I pulled to the side and I spitted that game
I met a lot of freaks in my lifespine
Freaked one night with a girl named Pam
The very next day I saw her with her man
One week passed and I was in her again
I had an old tender, her name was Janie
She was thirty-two and I was only eighteen
She likes to freak, she's just a fiend
It really didn't matter when I saw her in jeans
I wanna big freak, fat and slobby
I kick on back and I watch her mouth
Two tons of fun, big mama jama
A country-girl from Alabama
I met this girl, her name was Betty
Her pussy got wet and it smelled like death
I was tired as hell, I was drippin' sweat
But I was all up in her tryin' to hold my breath
Bake and shake us, I met this freak in Vegas
She said her name was Donna
She was a pitty little freak from China
I said I don't pimp or gigolo
I'm havin' so much money that I don't need a hoe
You can break yourself but you can't break me
You never met a player like $hort, baby
I knew a dick sucker named Betty-Jo
Took her to my home and we did it on the floor
The girl got freaky and I tell you more:
She was down on her knees beggin' to blow
She's like another freak named Ren`
You get her alone and she'll make your day
Like Burger King, she knows the play
But a freak like Ren`, you can have it your way...
These are the tales, the freaky tales...
These are the tales that I tell so well...
I met this girl, thick as hell
Only sixteen, said her name was Linell
I took her to my house, I could not wait
Her shit was much tighter than Central Safe
Let me tell you this since we talkin' young
I met another girl, said her name was Yvonne
Always talkin' about havin' fun
Once again in the bed I got it goin' on
I'm Sir Too $hort, couldn't be no punk
I try to get funky like female funk
So when you see me comin' or see me goin'
I keep my money, let the hoes keep throwin'
I once met a tender, she did it for free
On the Foothill bust number forty-three
All the way on the back she was workin' me
Had my big beatbox and I was jammin' the beat
I met this freak named aunt Winell
Macked on the baby like an ice-cold vet
Everythin' she had is what I get
Cause I'm Too $hort, baby, I don't play that shit
I met another freak, her name was Rita
Baby thought that $hort just might eat her
I told her like this, she can suck my peter
Or even go home cause I  knew I didn't need her
Scratched her name off my telephone book
Never again I took a second look
Cause the next young freak, her name was Sharon
She kept lookin', well, I kept stairin'
Her booty was stuffed in the jeans she was wearin'
She never left, she cutted out
I know you all know what I'm talkin' about
There's a freak named Shane, such a sinner
She smokes that pipe and she's gettin' thinner
Shane is cool but her mind is gone
One fat rock and it's goin' on
She had another buddy, came by my place
Thick ass bitch, said her name was Grace
She walked in the door wearin' a lace
You shoulda seen that look that was on my face
She's like this tender named Belinda
Homeboys call her Belinda the Blender
She gave head like she made it up
She was twenty years old with a big round butt
Had a girl slick like olive oil
Her father was rich and the girl was spoiled
When she got mad he blood would boil
But I rapped her off like I'm lookin' a toy...
These are the tales, the freaky tales...
The tales that I tell so well...
Shockedy life, Friday night, it's goin' on Too $hort
Three weeks ago I met this freak
She followed me around like Mary's sheep
I hitted around the corner and when she came
I grabbed her by the arm and I asked her name
She said it was Nina and her man's in Santa Rita
I took her to my home and homeboy, I geed her
Set her on the way the very next way
Playboy $hort was ready to play
I bumped to this girl, her name was Roseanne
We hitted the motel and got it goin' on
Holiday Inn to the break of dawn
When I took baby home, I freaked her mom
I knew this tender named Shanie
I took her to the house and let her freak on me
Baby was a fan, she loved my beat
But I wouldn't raise my leg to let her kiss my feet
I met this freak named Yolanda
Rolled baby doll like a brand new Honda
I was on top and she was up under
The bed hitted the wall and it sounded like thunder
I once had a datewith girl named Kitty
She was so fine with big fat tiddies
All night long she was actin' shitty
So i macked on baby like I was Frank Nitti
There's another girl, her name is Rose
I use to roll baby like brand new Volvos
I never saw Rose wearin' clothes
She's a pimp house pet, ready to pose
I was ridin' down the street when I met Janet
Her booty was bigger than the whole damn planet
Ass everywhere, I just can't stand it
Tried to poem it but I could not manage
I had this freak, her name was Bunny
Said I was the only man who ever called her honey
Everythin' I did to her was funny
I macked on bunny and I took her money
Eight tonight a date with Shirlie
She was really short and her hair was curly
If you saw baby you liked this girlie
She was so fine I went to get her early
Shirlie was freakin' like a girl named Rachel
Her bite was vicious and it sure was fatal
She liked to kiss all on my neval
Those are her lips on top of my label
I knew another freak, her name was Candy
Real big lips and they came in handy
I smooth got worked and it was so dandy
I hooked the brood up with my homeboy Randy
He did me a favor in return
Gave me a lizard, said her name was Laverne
Baby got tossed and I got it on
I grabbed the mic and started to sing my song
My young homeboy heard me rap
And said he had way more freaks than that
So I told him like this: they might be freakin'
But, boy, you never had that T-P-Treatment...As I walk through the valley of the shadow of death
I take a look at my life
And realize there's nothing left.
'Cause I've been blasting and laughing so long
That even my momma thinks that my mind has gone.
But I ain't never crossed a man that didn't deserve it.
Me be treated like a punk, you know that's unheard of.
You betta watch how ya talking
And where ya walking
Or you and your homies might be lined in chalk.
I really hate to trip but I gotta lob,
As they croak, I see myself in the pistol smoke.
Fool, I'm the kinda g that little homie's wanna be like,
On my knees in the night
Saying prayers in the street light.
We've been spending most our lives
Living in a gangsta's paradise.
We've been spending most our lives
Living in a gangsta's paradise.
We keep spending most our lives
Living in a gangsta's paradise.
We keep spending most our lives
Living in a gangsta's paradise.
Look at the situation, they got me facing,
I can't live a normal life, I was raised by the state.
So I gotta be down with the 'hood team,
Too much television watching, got me chasing dreams.
I'm an educated fool with money on my mind
Got my ten in my hand and a gleam in my eye.
I'm a locked out gangsta, set tripping banger
And my homies are down so don't arouse my anger.
Fool, death ain't nothing but a heart beat away,
I'm living life do or die, what can I say?
I'm twenty-three now, will I ever live to see twenty-four,
The way things is going I don't know.
Tell me why are we
So blind to see.
That the ones we hurt
Are you and me?
We've been spending most our lives
Living in a gangsta's paradise.
We've been spending most our lives
Living in a gangsta's paradise.
We keep spending most our lives
Living in a gangsta's paradise.
We keep spending most our lives
Living in a gangsta's paradise.
Power in the money, money in the power,
Minute after minute, hour after hour,
Everybody's running, but half of them ain't looking
It's going on in the kitchen
But I don't know what's cooking.
They say I gotta learn
But nobody's here to teach me.
If they can't understand it, how can they reach me?
I guess they can't,
I guess they won't,
I guess they front,
That's why I know my life is out of luck, foo!
We've been spending most our lives
Living in a gangsta's paradise.
We've been spending most our lives
Living in a gangsta's paradise.
We keep spending most our lives
Living in a gangsta's paradise.
We keep spending most our lives
Living in a gangsta's paradise.
Tell me why are we
So blind to see.
That the ones we hurt
Are you and me?
Tell me why are we
So blind to see.
That the ones we hurt
Are you and me?Junior M.A.F.I.A.
Niggaz... bitches...
Uhh
 Grab your dick if you love hip-hop
 Rub your titties if you love Big Poppa
Gotcha, open off the words I say because
 "This type of shit it happens everyday"
Check it out, uhh
Now who smoke more blunts than a little bit?
What are you a idiot?
Listen to the lyrics I spit like M1's
Got mad guns up in the cabin
Cause Cease ain't the one for the dibbin and dabbin shit
I make it happen, you got your ass caught
All you saw was fire, from the Honda Passport
Or the M.P., what if you see, then I miss ya
I blow up spots like little sisters
G'wan grit ya teeth, g'wan bite ya nails to the cuticles
Like Murray, my killings, be the most beautiful
Junior M.A.F.I.A. click, thick like Luke dancers
Niggaz grab your gats, bitches take a glance at
The little one, pullin over in the Land Rover
Playin Big Willie style with a chaffeur, yaknahmean?
Stack the green, read all between the lines
A nigga act up, makes the bastard hard to find
 I'm surrounded by criminals
Heavy rollers even the sheisty individuals
Smokin skunk and mad Phillies
Beatin down Billy Badasses, cracks in stacks and masses
If robbery's a class, bet I pass it
Shit get drastic, I'm buryin ya bastards
Big Poppa never softenin
Take you to the church, rob the preacher for the offerin
Leave the fucker coughin up blood, and his pockets like rabbit ears
Covered the wife, kleenex for the kid's tears
Versace wear, Moschino on my bitches
She whippin my ride, countin my one's, thinkin I'm richest
Just the way players play, all day everyday
I don't know what else to say
I've been robbin niggaz since Run and them was singin 'Here We Go'
Snatchin ropes at the Roxie homeboy you didn't know
My flow, detrimental to your health
Usually roll for self, I have son ridin shotgun
My mind's my nine, my pen's my Mac-10
My target, all you wack niggaz who started rappin
Junior M.A.F.I.A. steelo, niggaz know the half
Caviar for breakfast, champagne bubble baths
Runnin up in pretty bitches constantly
The Smalls bitch, who the fuck it was supposed to be?
I used to pack Macs in Cadillacs
Now I pimp gats in the Ac's, watch my niggaz backs
Nines in the stores, glocks in the bags
Maxin mini-markets, gettin money with the Arabs
No question, confession, yes it's the lyrical
Bitches squeeze your tits, niggaz grab your genitals
Proteins and minerals, excluse subliminals
Big Momma shoots the game to all you Willies and criminals
I kick the rilli with my peeps all day
325's roll by with the windows down halfway
D-K-N-Y, oh my, I'm jiggy
It's all about the Smalls and my fuckin nigga Biggie
Bitches love the way I bust a rhyme
Cause they all in line screamin one more time
Niggaz, grab your dicks if you love hip-hop
Bitches rub-a-dub in the back of the club, straight up